Tonight I do have to add he has started singing with me. When I sang, he chimed in as well. It's the best ever! I enjoy these moments so much and don't ever want them to end. Life is good.
Photos courtesy of Geoff Mayes Media (www.geoffmayesmedia.com)
“Save Thou Me from the mire, that I may not stick” (ver. 14). From that whereof above he had spoken, “Fixed I am in the clay of the deep, and there is no substance.” Furthermore, since ye have duly received the exposition of that expression, in this place there is nothing further for you to hear particularly. From hence he saith that he must be delivered, wherein before he said that he was fixed: “Save Thou Me from the mire, that I may not stick.” And he explaineth this himself: “Let Me be rescued from them that hate Me.” They were themselves therefore the clay wherein he had stuck. But the following perchance suggesteth itself. A little before he had said, Fixed I am; now he saith, Save Thou Me from the mire, that I may not stick:” whereas after the meaning of what was said before he ought to have said, Save Thou Me from the mire where I had stuck, by rescuing Me, not by causing that I stick not. Therefore He had stuck in flesh, but had not stuck in spirit. He saith this, because of the infirmity of His members. Whenever perchance thou art seized by one that urgeth thee to iniquity, thy body indeed is taken, in regard to the body thou art fixed in the clay of the deep: but so long as thou consentest not, thou hast not stuck; but if thou consentest, thou hast stuck. Let then thy prayer be in that place, in order that as thy body is now held, so thy soul may not be held, so thou mayest be free in bonds.
When we wonder why our businesses, departments, or teams aren’t as successful as they should be, when we wonder why our career seems to have stalled, is it possible that we are overlooking the simple things that open the gap between average and outstanding?
In the meantime, we see the President of the United States talking trash to the people of Arizona while bowing and scraping to the President of Mexico. We also see his assistant secretary of state, a guy named Michael Posner, a wuss who no doubt spent his high school years being given well-deserved wedgies, denouncing Arizona to those paragons of virtue and defenders of human rights, the Red Chinese!
drop spoonfuls of alternating mixture into the pan and tap/shake lightly to level (see the first pic on my blog)
2. You start being more responsive, and amiable to your team mates. Sort of like Barrack Obama wanting to win a re-election. You smile at them, with a nod that says they won’t be making a mistake if they supported you, and that you will take care of them, come what may.
I am awaiting stock of the fabulous distress ink pads, will be selling them at a price of £ £4.50 each or any 10 for £40.00. Also available distress ink refills and alcohol inks.
For years I jotted down prayer requests on scraps of paper stuck in my Bible, or wrote them in the notebooks I used for taking notes in church. Many of them I kept in my head. One of my unspoken prayer requests for a long time was just to be able to organize things so I could pray more effectively. So one day I bought a little spiral-bound notebook and began to try and organize my prayer requests in sections so I could pray for different things and people on different days. That worked for quite awhile, but not quite as well as I had hoped. Then my daughter went off to college and took a class called Study of Prayer. They made prayer journals as a class project. I was so impressed when I saw what a prayer journal could look like -- and with its potential as a helpful tool for one’s prayer life. I studied the journal my daughter had made and gathered my own ideas from here and there. Then I began to put together my own prayer journal. It has become every bit as helpful as I envisioned it would be.
They shrewdly named their new company after James Hamilton, a local developer who owned much of Lancaster County. Not surprisingly, he gave them a cut-rate deal on their watch factory in Lancaster. The new firm had an ambitious goal: they wanted to make "America's Finest Watch." They succeeded.
My hubby, Frank, and I will be celebrating our 16 year wedding anniversary in early May and because of Clearly Sentimental About Anniversaries I am ahead of the card making game for once! He loves the cards I make for him and complains I don't do it often enough! HA! Well, take that, Mr. Frank! LOL
Fantasy update. I finished 6th this week and I actually owe it to the rain since I had Jimmie Johnson who was in 10th win the rain stopped the race. He had a mechanical issue that would have put him laps behind and me even farther down in the standings. I’m 8th overall which is going to be a hard hill to climb back up from my 7 point outing at Bristol.
Scientists worldwide have been studying the traditional Mediterranean lifestyle to understand why their life expectancy was so high and people aged so well.
I will need to have a MRI done yet. I couldn't use my arm for a couple of days. It feels a little better, after getting some, strong pain meds early Sunday morning, at the Emergency Room. My left arm is swollen and a vein is poking out. Back to the cards, I used Digital Stamps from Leaves of Time, Inger Harding, Glitterbabe, Delicious Doodles, Imagine Make and Share, TLC, Tiffany's Garden, Marjies Malarkies, Little Muslings and Beccy's. For embellishments, I used stickers, gems, assorted rubberstamps, ribbon, embossing powder, Copic Markers for coloring them, Making Memories, Martha Stewart's punches, Snowflake die cuts, I did at Archiver's and Cuttlebug Embossing Folders. I used assorted cardstock and pattern papers, some of the pattern papers are last year's in my stash. I used the Corner Chomper for the corners of the cards. I hope everyone is having a great and Blessed week! It's really cold here.
It is only once in every 1,988 Kali-yugas that Śrī Kṛṣṇa descends personally to the earth. (It happens once in every day of Brahmā, approximately at noon in his time-scale. The interval between one noon and the next for Brahmā holds the same duration of moments as 2 sets of 14 intervals called manvantara, each of which holds 71 divya-yugas – in which there is one Kali-yuga. In years, it is equivalent to more than 8.6 billiion.) The advent of the All-Attractive upon the earth is such a treasure of good fortune that the gods of paradise line up to incarnate on earth to take part in it. This amazing event has just come to a close, and thus the dark shadow of lamentation falls heavily upon the soul of the Earth. That is the root of her depression.
The sky is red, the Earth is flat and Russia started this war.
Are most content
The starting point was on the F1 track. In front of us hung the start light, now in red. When it turns green and the gun is fired, we’ll begin our night Run For A Brighter World (that’s the theme for this race). This time, I wasn’t aiming for a groundbreaking finish, just a pain-free run.
You are here:
barefoot out to the patio-den,
Mr. Romney doesn’t have to apologize for his father’s success or his grandfather’s success or even his own. Being financially successful isn’t an automatic handicap that prevents compassion towards people who are less fortunate. Being rich doesn’t seem to impede Warren Buffet’s ability to understand what others are going through. Being successful doesn’t seem to keep George Clooney from understanding the plight of people who are not successful. So the argument that Mitt Romney has to apologize for being rich and successful or has to apologize for being the son of somebody who was rich and successful just doesn’t seem to cut it. It’s not an excuse for being out of touch and totally deaf to people who need help.
Middle right: lifesize reindeer, inside Central Chitlom
I love how you can see all the layers where it was distressed. You can see the wood and the primer and the brown from the previous owners.
The email said Captain Freeman died in 2009 but he really died in August 2008 in Boise, ID. In March 2009, they named the post office in honor of him. Below is President Bush’s speech he delivered to the nation when the award was presented to Captain Freeman:
Hi everyone! I am back from Phoenix from the Spellbinders DT retreat and it was amazing! I have a couple of photos I can share here in a couple of days. But first I have a card to share that was for a recent Paper Crafts call that wasn't picked up.
You were mine before immersion blenders were on everyone’s wedding registry. I think we were at around ten years together. You helped me through dental surgery, *several* times, and I am forever grateful. I thought we’d last into February at least, but it was not to be.
1 medium summer squash, halved lengthwise and cut into half moons
Thus, it is in the seller’s best interest to keep the due diligence period as short as possible. That way, if the buyer does terminate, the property can go back on the market quickly and hopefully with little ill effect. There is always some ill effect when a buyer terminates, however – the next buyer will wonder WHY the first terminated. Sometimes there is just no good reason. But the subsequent buyer will be more suspicious, and will devalue the property accordingly.
She’s very good in this. But I don’t like the song at all, and I thought her performance was boring. Just bad song choice for me. Stay away from Whitney.
Back in my undergraduate days, one of my political science professors semi-jokingly explained the difference between our (the United States) political system and the Soviet system: “they have one political part, we have one more than that.” While this was obviously a oversimplification, he did make a very good point. After all, while we do get a choice, it is a rather limited choice between the Republican or the Democrat.
But whatever. I’m a nice person. I wave back at people. I guess this somewhat gives me hope in humanity when strangers wave at each other…
The northern suburbs-based teacher, with more than 20 years experience, refused to divulge details to the Cape Times on Tuesday.
Next Week on A Poke at the Box:
Then came this weirdo with a permanently dilated pupil, a shocking red mullet, no eyebrows, and...he - or she? - is kinda cute. Or handsome. Cute? This mysterious person is wearing makeup...
3. Get a large bucket of really hot water. You can just crank the hot water tap in your bathtub or shower and fill it up with that.
One year ago, I was in really good shape. I was running, I was starting to train for my first half marathon, I was eating for fuel. I felt healthy and strong.
2) Avoid using language that psychologically segregates our students by gender. For example, avoid making comments such as, “the girls are sitting so nicely and quietly” because chances are, not all the girls are sitting nicely and quietly, and not all the boys are running around wreaking havoc in the classroom. Speak to the specific child with the behaviour, not the gender of the child.
I know that today is my "spare mums" birthday and I hope she's having a wonderful day. Happy Birthday Suz!
But this post is not about the Betamax, which is a B-word. It's about the first movie we watched on our Betamax: Caddyshack.
So, with all my time spent dashing between meetings and events – often spilling well into the evening – it can be tough trying to fit time in to cook a scrummy-Stepford-Wives-esque meal. Having friends over for dinner mid week? Crikey… Better break out the chilli again! Well, food munchers, no more shall I fear the masses descending on my house! No more shall I fret when I waltz in through the door as the clock strikes late.
There are many supplements people recommend to support our immune systems and one that springs to mind is Vitamin C. There’s the Himalayan Salt and Vitamin C Protocol – see? I mean …. C? It’s even in a TITLE of a PROTOCOL.
but is due for a
In January 2012 the Irish Examiner reported the sale of 125-acres outsideCork city on the N25/Ballincollig Bypass for a price reckoned to equate to €20-30,000 per acre. The apparent fact that the marketing of the property was confined to erecting “for sale” signs on the property raised some eyebrows as there was the possibility that potential buyers who mightn’t have driven along the N25 might have been interested in the property. Some suggested the sale to the University College Cork/Munster Agricultural Society was a “sweetheart deal”. DTZ Sherry FitzGerald marketed the property on behalf of NAMA.
08 Diddy Wah Diddy
it took a little practice at first, not trying to soothe bonzo out of a crying jag or not trying to create a world for him where he wouldn't have to have upsets that would result in tears, but it felt really right knowing that crying was bonzo healing, offloading and working through big feelings and that it shouldn't be confused with suffering.
“The poet only asks to get his head into the heavens. It is the logician who seeks to get the heavens into his head. And it is his head that splits.”
This is the first part of the I'm Hearing Voices Blogfest. We need to pick a character - one that is hard for us to write, and interview them. The character I picked, when I first started writing her, she was passive, unsure and reactionary. Some of that is her character but she was too much of a doormat. So I'm trying to make her more.
the next night, while we were tucking the girls into bed,
WHY does this have to be the week before Mother's Day!?!?!
I found the last day one of the best days, people would come and talk to me, try and find out something new. Mostly the last day was where a lot of the laughs were had and where people would say thankyou.
Place: King’s College London, Waterloo Campus
(yes, Gurmukh is leading both classes!)
Oscar Carillo called 9-1-1 and said two black males robbed him at gunpoint. Responding officers encountered two black males in the area of the report, and shot and killed one of them: 19-year-old Kendrec McDade.
visited sites with biographies on Tesla
“Yeah but at least I stuck around for brains rather than asking for excess nasal hair.” I retort.
Hometown Heroes:
So I know you guys have all heard about Erykah Badu's new video, "Window Seat". I'm not able to embed the video, but I will link to it here. I will however embed the video that inspired the "Window Seat" video by Matt and Kim. To give a summary for those not able to see the video, Badu basically parks a car that looks as if it is a Cadillac from the 1960s, gets out, and walks while taking off her clothing piece by piece in the Dealey Plaza area of Dallas. Dealey Plaza is the area where JFK was shot. At the end of the video, she falls to the ground as if she is assassinated, and blue "blood" spills on the ground that says "groupthink". Then she says this:
Remember me?
I will be teaching my class on Tuesday night!
I've moved onto the next step with my felted seahorses, mounting them on a background. I used my dumfing machine (that's an embellisher for those unfamiliar with this wipso and twiglet term ;) ) to add merino wool and some other bits n pieces to a piece of cotton fabric.
Outstanding Added benefits Plus Traits Of Leather-based Satchel Carrier
…goddammit.
And the reason why the battery was flat? I’d turned on an interior light to look for something in the car when I parked it up. And forgot to turn it off. Four days later, battery drained…:-(.
Collins went on to touch on the future of the team beyond this season. He made it clear that before he hangs it up he wants this team to be contending for championships. His goal is to continue to develop and win games and to turn Philadelphia into a premiere free agent destination like the Philles and Eagles have managed to do.
4. Know your skin tone. Makeup must match your complexion so you won't look like too made up.
another by little human-like creatures "Rakkans"
You can never be the best. You can always be better.
In an incident on January 25, Taylor bit Miss Jackson's finger when she confronted him about cheating on her and punched her in the stomach when she told him she might be pregnant.
So, this was my second lesson: God worked providentially through my circumstances to put me in a place where the gospel would penetrate my heart for the first time. I thought I was going to New York because I needed a summer job and had found an opportunity to be paid to play the trumpet. God had so much more in store for me!
Tony Stark: Uh… genius, billionaire, playboy, philanthropist…
So I did some digging, every good film needs heavy research, and I discovered a lot that for me started to make more sense about the story.
every Hour (Thank You).
And this is where acceptance is blocked out, by pastors who forget to love and preach that it’s ok to beat down our young men and women until the homosexuality is gone – as if it were possible to do so.
on wagons, and fled from the city. Tiresias fled with his fellow citizens, but he soon died when they arrived by night to the spring named Tilphussa. Having traveled far enough, the Theban refugees built a new city Hestiaea, where they settled down.
by Prophet T.B. Joshua is
And, by the way, actually WATERED my FEW remaining irises
We, living in a country changed by force and condemned for opposing it ,nationalists like me realise that a violent revolution as espoused by some, is not the preferred option, how indeed can we support such a course, that will surely lead to the death of the innocent and the break-up of our country and indeed Europe. Yet having some intellect we realise that Europe is on course for bloodshed, that history dictates that disparate peoples simply cannot live together whilst one offends the other. This stance is far, far from racism, far from simply hating for hatreds sake, people such as I harbour no secret desire to take over the world, we have no plans for camps, wholesale slaughter or tyranny. Yet for nationalists like me, we fight for our very right to exist, to, it is hoped, prevent conflict and to adhere to natures plan, rather than impose against the will of the people, an agenda, it would seem that the BNP, for all their good, travel another road.
And right now, the State is auctioning off a reported €14bn of deposits at Anglo Irish Bank (“Anglo”) and Irish Nationwide Building Society (INBS). The auction is being conducted by the National Treasury Management Agency on the basis of directions obtained in Dublin’s High Court on 8th February, 2011 (accessible here and here). Those directions were obtained pursuant to the provisions of the newly enacted Credit Institutions (Stabilisation) Act, a controversial piece of legislation rushed through the Oireachtas just before Christmas. The Act has been criticised for being draconian and undemocratic and grants colossal and unprecedented powers to the government in relation to the private sector (though the main focus of the Act is the banking sector). The Act, for example, allows for court hearings to be held in private and for reporting to be forbidden.
Probably the worst thing I have ever done in my life was to throw someone in front of a train---OK, well I was 11 years old, he was the school bully and he was picking on my brother who had polio-----no police, no gaol time and we have been friends for life.
Yesterday, I took some "oak" pieces to my all time favorite retail consignment store-JFGMs. That place changes from week to week, and they have the most fun things ever. The store is almost like a living organism- I am so happy they support and sell my art there.
Beans and nuts
Mr. Freeman, however, is convinced. He looks forward to the academic debate to come. Meanwhile, Mr. Freeman hopes to use any publicity generated by his book to push for preservation of the site.
I am overweight.
A lifelong prude who thought the word bloody was the nadir of bad language and had no idea her own brother was gay, despite holidays in Morocco, a house in Brighton that he shared with a long-standing partner and a prediliction for Ethel Merman. When she watched the Naked Civil Servant with my other grandma while they were on babysitting duty at ours one time, she had to have the whole concept of homosexuality expalined to her. She simply had no idea such a thing existed. She was that naive, and easily shockable.
The main event in NASCAR as every race fan knows is the Daytona 500, the racing equivalent of the superbowl. That time of year for new drivers, new sponsors, new teams and teammates, new cars, new paint, new just about everything you can think of come together for really the first time of the season…so what does that equal?? Simple..drama on wheels…
Put noodles in bowls, ladle hot soup over noodles, and watch it disappear.
EPUB is alive and well! My students worked hard on their exploration projects. We did most of our work on the computer, but the viewing will happen on the iPads. It is still a work in progress, but I wanted to share a bit of their good work with you ahead of time. Teams of students researched a type of explorer – like under the sea, space, or Africa. Each student in the group performed a small research project looking for the important information about their exploration. There was an outline of information and graphic required – the twist this time was that students had to record the sources for both the information AND their graphics. At the fifth grade level, information citation is not ALA approved, but a hot link to the site or the graphic they used.
The Alamos Red Blend 2010 is a blend of Malbec, Carbarnet Sauvignon, Petit Verdot, Bornada, Tempranillo, and Syrah. Like the Trapiche Malbec, this Wine comes from the foothills of the Andes in the Mendoza region of Argentina.
anne@thetwocentscorp.com
And I value that full
“Go home and prepare a feast, holiday food and drink; and share it with those who don’t have anything: This day is holy to God. Don’t feel bad. The joy of God is your strength!” – Nehemiah 8:9-10
Waldo Farmer’s Market
Back to being constantly amazed...ry LOVES books. I usually have to read her about FOUR books at bedtime, and even after that she says, "mommy, read da book!" and gets mad when we're done. We typically read Green Eggs and Ham, a Tinkerbell book, I Love You Through and Through, and Goodnight Moon. That's a LOT of night night story time!!!
What kind of literature is it then? Interim literature, is my best guess. One with its own forms and manners to be learned and explored, as any other kind of interim literature.
Knight, Stephen. Crime Fiction 1800-2000: Detection, Death, Diversity. Houndmills, UK: Palgrave Macmillan, 2004.
journeyswithasimplegirl
by the accident of birth—washes over me and, of course, I am thinking of things DnD.
Here are some important facts:
comfortable with yourself, and learn your body and what feels good. This, my friends, will make your sex life MUCH better. Once you are comfortable and can learn what makes you cum, then you can teach your partner, or do it yourself when you’re fucking, and sex just got a whole lot more interesting.
It also has properties that enable it to lower blood-glucose levels, so it is valuable as an adjunct to diabetes treatment.
P/S: I miss all of you! :)
This is a region I would have known nothing about had it not been for Sid's 'coup de foudre' (love at 1st sight /hit by lightening) for an amazing (if somewhat impractical) building my mother lovingly referred to as "my husband's dance hall girl". Mom and Sid left us several years ago. I hope my sharing this home, which they both so loved, will give you as much pleasure as it gave to them.
Our next place was the Dock.. gosh this is so god as we had a good time walking around reaching the boats as they were stopped at the yards. The best thing I enjoyed the most was that I was with my Inline Skates and I was going around with my wheels with the wind blowing off to my face and wiping the body with the awesomeness vibe. If you like skating and like to wokr hard on your calf muscles, then you should try over the hardcore road skating. the road and the side walks are pretty fine, but in some areas the surface gets very rough and you feel the tension if creates on the legs. So if, really interested in going to Gloucester and looking for great information before going there, I would highly recomend you to read this site. t has all the information before you and the like the best places and how to get aournd the city and see all the best areas in the shortest possible time. Visit the Gloucester City Site and pay a visit for a great time.A great English city with vibe for life and souls. Just got the idea as it’s the Easter holidays, and on long vacation till next week. Got in from Worcester Foregate station and in less than forty minutes we could reach the city of Gloucester. The first and most amazing place we wen was the Gloucester Cathedral. It has an amazing artistic environment where it gives a the souls a calming effect.
(The historical tableau freezes.)
I'm doing a (I quote) 'hilarious' series for the OUP (for ages 8-10) with illustrations by my hugely talented 11 year old daughter - Mina May (big yay!)
Now we come to the cake and a glimpse of some shoes. By the way all my stamps come from various sets from Studio G - they are very tiny sets that I got from my local craft shop for around 99p. This time the card opens horizontally - up, over and down.......
R - Our publication date is April 8th. Easter day, in honour of the pagan Goddess, Estra.
The study was funded in part by the National Heart, Lung and Blood Institute and published Thursday in the journal Circulation Research.
– 900 In Philly Avoid Local Gun Licensing, Get Florida Permits
Next spring, my book, What’s for Lunch? How Schoolchildren Eat Around the World will be published by Red Deer Press here in Canada (it will come out later in 2012 in the U.S) and the answer will be available—in a beautifully designed and illustrated format—to other parents. I’ll be offering some sneak peeks in the new year as we get closer to publication.
6. http://clownponders.wordpress.com/ - I always enjoy reading his blog. He’s so creative and fun! It’s one of those styles that always keep you coming back.
WIE: What you are saying is that modern science, from a completely different angle—not assuming anything about the existence of a spiritual dimension of life—has somehow come back around, and is finding itself in agreement with that view as a result of its own discoveries.
I've also been referred to a Healthcare Psychologist who has now accepted me on a programme which is designed to help people cope with long term health conditions. The waiting list is a pretty hefty one, so in the meantime, i've been advised to go on another programme to meet people with similar (or the same) conditions so that they can pass on their advice on how they deal with the day to day. I should also be hearing from the Healthcare service about some relaxation and meditation/aromatherapy sessions to help me relax.
ribbon
"It's about how members of one generation sometimes pay for the sins of their fathers, it's about the dangers of excess and the danger of power without responsibility."
The play itself has been lauded for bringing realism (and, we guess, nihilism and rebellion) to the English stage back in the 50s. It is certainly shockingly gritty by even today's standards - again, not so much because of the poverty or unwanted pregnancy stuff, so much as the cruelty of Jimmy and Osborne's relatively sympathetic treatment of it. It's as if Osborne is trying to tell us Jimmy is a prophet, someone who (as the "citation needed" intro of Osborne's wiki tells us) "argued for the cleansing wisdom of bad behavior and bad taste, and combined unsparing truthfulness with devastating wit." Now, we have a personal bone to pick with such a philosophy: mostly because we think compassion is the only universal wisdom, and behaving like an asshole isn't so much shaking off the shackles of a hypocritical, stifling society, as it is, well, being an asshole.
Things I would do differently next time:
1/4 cup yellow cornmeal
It’s the final chapter to Nolan’s brilliant Batman trilogy and one of the most hyped movies of the year but I can’t help but feel that this is a rather underwhelming trailer. Perhaps it’s because The Avengers trailers were full of action and style and all of the current hype is all about that, but there are still some interesting things to consider from the trailer.
Digital Humanities v. New Media
Wow, two posts within a few days, I haven't done that in a while! Well toady's post is for a layout from a sketch over at the Once Upon a Sketch blog. Once Upon a Sketch is run by Nadia Cannizzo who I first came across when she entered a gorgeous layout in a challenge on the Bo Bunny blog and I have been following her blog ever since as her work is just stunning! Nadia started up the Once Upon a Sketch blog recently and it is fantastic with some seriously talented designers. I love sketches and challenges but don't often get time these days to take part in them but when I saw this sketch, the journaling criteria and all the beautiful takes the designers have done for it I just had to make some time to do it and I had such fun doing it too! :)
The groups also presented a ‘poop’ shaped cake to Lim during the chief minister’s 51st birthday last Dec.
Entertaining my family during their summer visits. So many fond memories of the time share.
Place tiny rounds of crust into mini-muffin pans.
Here is a Richard Nixon insert (should I try this one for TTM too? oh wait...) a base card, and a Cliff Lee/Rangers Insert.
* there were good records released in 1975, but most were albums: The Hissing Of Summer Lawns, Blood On The Tracks, Gene Clark's No Other, Neil Young's Zuma, Dion's Born To Be With You. Even then, these were hardly heralds of a musical future.
Suddenly, a short distance ahead, Toby stops, her ears go up, head tilted... dropping her snout to the grass along the left side of the trail, sniffing. Toby continues to be in her alert stance, she raises her head and looks in my direction with those big brown eyes, then looks back toward the trees, ears tall, turning, listening for another sound. She trots further up the trail near the bend, darting between the tall trees and out of sight... "Toby... Toby come!" I shout for her. I hear Jack back behind me, "Aw, she's just looking for the gremlins." I turn back toward Jack, "What?" I don't see Jack on the trail behind, concerned I start walking in that direction, but again yell, "Toby come." Jack continues, "...the gremlins that come before the ogre. You know, the one I told you about.... the ogre that comes in the night from the trees next to the house," his voice going to a more of a squeak, then I hear the splash as he falls into the pool now just beyond the boulders and bushes. "Jack, are you okay?" I yell. "Yeah, I just slipped, I'm alright." Jack appears from the small opening in between the bushes, his clothes wet up to his chest area, draped tight against his small body. "Go find Toby, I'm okay."
The system has really been worth the money. And most importantly, it's not a short term fix. You can continue to add new or different responsibilities and customize it to your child's age and needs. I would give it four out of five stars and that is only because I would love to see it be more affordable for more people, especally those with multiple kids. I bought three peg boards. The other is waiting for the 2 year old to be ready to use it. I highly recommend the Accountable Kids program.
The sad truth is that the more I read, the less I know what to do. I have to do something, vote for someone. I can’t just give up and not bother. I value democracy too much for that, and, as George Jean Nathan, a writer and critic once said, “Bad officials are elected by good citizens who do not vote.”
Bjork exploded into public consciousness with her starburst vocals on 'Birthday', the 1987 debut single by the Sugarcubes. Björk’s ethereal voice and elf-girl image had critics and fans bewitched. Rave reviews predicted imminent world conquest for the Icelandic band. But it didn't happen, and the Sugarcubes never quite scaled the heights of their debut again. Over three albums, the group veered from moderately captivating dream pop to quirky, negligible new wave and gradually whittled down its cult following rather than expanding it.
It has been brought to my attention that there is NO angel policy whatsoever on the new me to you stamp range so you are not allowed to sell ANYTHING you make with them at all. It was not made public before they went on sale as most buyers thought that they would be the same as the other docrafts products but when it was queried it says angel policy details to follow. My crafty friend had her handmade card removed from ebay after it apparently breached Carte Blanche's copyright.
you only have to search for it
Wednesday February 3, 2010
With my other friends by my side
-something to applique (shirt, baby bib, onesie, etc.)
(An aside: as any Forestry or Arboricultural student will tell you, Evelyn wrote what is recognised as the first textbook on silviculture (I’ll let you google that), entitled Sylva, or A Discourse on Forest-Trees and the Propagation of Timber in His Majesty’s Dominions, first published in book form in 1664 and, remarkably, still in print)
1 condenses
Milk mustache or not,
And as soon as we know what kingdom we're swaping gifts with we could make a few tokens that the king and queen could have in their bags if they unexpectedly want to thank someone who helps out. Even tokens suitable for children would be good!
Growth metric: The percentage change in emissions per unit turnover, compared to the average of the previous five years (or number of years available until 2014/15).
Just because it was Friday the 13th, the world had to stop?
(just relax, just relax)
To name one thing, I did not enjoy a lot of the episodes between the arcs in the first series that much, an issue I did not really have this time. They were a lot more enjoyable this time around.
This morning he came in the kitchen and said, “I have a little problem.”
Spiritual-But-Not-Committed (SBNC)
I wanted to stay, from the bottom of my heart.
Like chocolate, having too much can make you feel guilty (at one point I owned 146 pairs of footwear).
Paggi House's Executive Chef Shane Stark and Z Tequila's Pepe Zevada are going to pair up food & tequila on Wednesday, Feb. 3rd, 7:00pm. Paggi House is located on 200 Lee Barton Drive. As one of my favorite happy hour locations (dog friendly too!), this dinner isn't one to miss. Reservations are a Must! $75 per person. Menu follows.
In that way?”
Diddy/Dirty-Money ft. Swizz Beatz perform “Ass on the Floor”
At the end of January J and I were able to go back to Baltimore for a week, and my friend threw me a baby shower! It was totally an unexpected gesture, and I loved getting to spend some time with a large group of my friends all at once, and received lovely, thoughtful, presents! Here's a link to the whole Flickr set, and some highlights below:
I thought it would be fun to layer a bunch of it onto a journal page. And I had a little picture I'd drawn from my 2 minute illustration to use. Here's the page:
In the wake of his controversial remarks, Tunku Abdul Aziz later issued a written statement to the press late this afternoon saying that he had spoken to DAP Secretary-General Lim Guan Eng and DAP Parliamentary Leader Lim Kit Siang on the matter.
If we want to be used by God in great ways, then we should be ready to make the sacrifices this requires. I’d much rather be God’s special occasion utensil. There is liberty in Christ, and the freedom to do well only strengthens those bonds. What purpose do your closest “friends” serve? Are they an opportunity for ministry? Are they helping you to grow in your faith? If neither of these are the case I recommend you reconsider. Certain people are appropriately suited for the associate category in life. The righteous chooses his friends carefully: but the way of the wicked leads them astray. Proverbs 12:26 (KJV)
A month ago, I moved to Boston! Time is such a strange thing, because sometimes it seems like I've been here forever and other times it seems like I just got here.
To understand why the Duke lacrosse case had the effect that it did you have to understand the context. The first thing to note is that the allegations in the Duke Lacrosse case involved gang rape. As I explained in part one, gang rape is not a crime commonly committed by white men of European origin. Certainly in Britain, it has been grudgingly acknowledged that most gang rapes are committed by exclusively non-white or mixed race gangs, in fact researchers have struggled to identify any examples of gang rapes being committed by gangs consisting exclusively of native whites.
On the front door was a legal document stating that whereby
So while some people wonder, what comes first – the chicken or the egg – I wonder what comes first — the seed or the flower that creates its own seeds to spread.
It's been so long since I've blogged that I actually started to miss it. It's easy to forget about (um…let's not mention the measly three blog posts that make up 2012), but it's so fun for me to look back on later. I am glad to be back!
“By the time Eisenhower became president in 1953, the communist insurgency against the French had become a fierce war. In 1952, President Truman had authorized $60 million for support of the French military efforts in Indochina. In 1953, President Eisenhower increased that authorization six-fold because his advisors convinced him that, “it was the cheapest way to block the spread of communism in Southeast Asia.” Again, he urged the French government to grant independence and withdraw from Indochina. When the French refused, Ike said their response was, ‘An example of the stupidity of men’.”
Step 6: The dough will eventually become smooth and springy. Set aside to rest for 1/2 hour. Facebook Time!
the massively popular modern Eclipse jeans for women.
The Bankers Box Underbed Storage Box goes together with relative ease, though I had to look very carefully at some of the printed diagrams to get the order right. Once I did that, it was a breeze. The assembled box is sturdy – the plastic handles at the end not only make it easy to hold the box but they help hold the ends together.
Mahan perfectly placed a grenade in the center of the bushes, kicking up small shrubs, sand, and dirt.
"You must wake and call me early, call me early, mother dear;
You are always in my thoughts.
A lot of the book deals with Gwen's sadness over her mother passing, blaming herself for her mother’s death, and learning to be happy again. It also deals with her self-doubt about her place in the Academy, and her worth. The way she kept knocking herself down over the potential love interest was annoying. Considering that the only guy she kissed was fantasizing about another girl, it’s understandable.
Thanks for all the wonderful ideas and inspiration!
And there are surprising a large number of good sushi restaurants on Ventura Blvd too, which I will miss. So, as one of my last weekday lunches in Studio City (before moving on to a new job I am super excited about in West LA, which will of course have its own stellar lunchspots) - "Gaston" and I decided to check out Kiwami in Studio City.
* Need Safeway Club card.
Oh, I wish I were you....
We also return to our view of the teller, also now unobstructed by the bars. I believe Hitchcock frames her without the bars to concentrate on performance, not of the actor but of the character. The suspense comes from whether she keep her facade up.
And let’s not forget that this is just seasons 1 through 5; I’m pretty sure Ben gets some more kills in season 6 (Widmore, for example). Pretty much the only way you can escape Ben Linus is to be a kid (Charlie Hume), have a kid (Penny Widmore, Danielle Rousseau), or stay out of his way. And stay away from Juliet. This count doesn’t even include the deaths he masterminded. Anyone remember Goodwin? I didn’t think so.
Used in more than 6,000 products (often sugar-free or “diet” versions), millions of people consume this toxin, believing it to be a healthy alternative to sugar.
Following the embarrassing news report, the TSA quickly issued a statement. “The TSA was recently made aware that a newly implemented change to the system used to process airline and airport employee background checks resulted in a delay for requests submitted through the American Association of Airport Executives. The cause of the issue was quickly identified, and TSA and AAAE have worked together to implement a solution,” said TSA spokesman Jon Allen.
bzzzzzzzzzzzz
We cycled to our local park and were the only people playing tennis on the six court.
One of the most frustrating things in the world for an individual, is the inability to remember simple things when asked a direct question, rather than one that circumvents the main point. It is this malady that prevents me from having anything to really say about myself, but here's my first attempt I have many layers...like an onion, not a parfait (if you don't get the reference, you need find a childhood) Sunlight Summertime Beach Nutella Unexpected Surprises The taste of wild strawberries.
Another clue is the photograph of the teenage girl with chipped blue fingernails wearing a baggy grey sweatshirt. She has this beautiful distorted Inge -like body in the picture. There is an Adidas lanyard hanging from her neck that holds a set of keys. The keys dangle between her thighs. She is sitting on a guardrail. One fictive interpretation might be that she is a teenage runaway. There is a surprising anecdote about this portrait. The young woman in the picture told me that she had just discovered that she was pregnant.
See apparently, although I am sexy, I couldn’t pull off seductive if my life depended on it, and ok, I’ll admit….I GOT JUST A WEE BIT TOUCHY!
Anyway, there you have it. INCEPTION is a movie that I will own, that I will watch many times. I plan to see it in the theater again. I really, really loved it, and I hope everyone will go see it.
So if we now accept that this theory is how the might wing work, we need to look at the legality and construction of the set up. Firstly a passive system that involves no moving parts or driver intervention is legal. Secondly the rules on the closed sections forming the front wing are much freer than those applied to the rear wing. So slots can be legally made across the side spans of the front wing. Clearly it would be legal in both of these respects, that the stalling slot can be made to blow at certain speeds.
The problem with Newt Gingrich, is that he has so much personal and political baggage that he'll have a tough time winning against the equally vacillating Mitt Romney. Also, if Newt is to stay strong, he'll have to get the religious conservatives to look past his spotty (to say the least) past of moral indiscretions (which they're alway wont to do with Democrats, but always seem to be able to do with Republicans). Maybe Newt can salvage his relationship with these right-wing Christians by telling them that he has repented for his past sins, and that he'll need their help and guidance to stay on the straight and narrow moving forward.
I wouldn’t necessarily recommend dining here unless you’re stuck in the area and can’t be bothered venturing too far. We would never go and pay full price…. and if you do want to catch that fire show make sure you book early… or just stay downstairs with the punters!
8. Queen of Misery
Both of the elements describe this layout as it was celebrating
Posted by eric.stern in International on December 18, 2011 10:32 pm / no comments
-foam paint brush
To those people still “nostalgic” for the flavorless, meaningless, vomit-inducing cheese-fest that is late 90s music, is your brain incapable of progressing? Do you even have a brain? How can you possibly think the BSB still sounds good? Help me understand, actually don’t. If I have to listen to a Backstreet Boys song one more time, my brain is literally going to explode and I am going to vomit all over you.
A satellite carrier may only make use of the section 119 license to retransmit network stations to subscribers who reside in “unserved households.” An “unserved household,” is one that cannot receive an over-the-air signal of Grade B intensity from the local network station affiliated with the same network using a conventional rooftop antenna. If a subscriber can receive the local network signal, the satellite carrier may not provide the subscriber with a distant signal of the same network. Nor can the satellite carrier use the section 119 license to provide commercial establishments with network stations. Only private home viewing of network stations is permitted.
But heavens awash with claret and amber.
Keep your woods O Nature, and the quiet places by the woods,
Caitlin straightened up in the back seat, craning her neck to see out the front window. “It says . . .”
Happy stitching in 2012 everyone!
Maybe she was sitting still because she was worried about her brother, Wolowitz. He's in the kitty hospital right now recovering from a blocked urinary tract. Poor guy. He went in yesterday, and we get to bring him home tomorrow morning. The house isn't the same without him.
***Remember if you do 5 cards this month following the challenge, your name will go into a draw for a prize at the end of November! (This challenge CAN be combined with any other blog or forum challenges that you do this month.)
Chirped an interested looking Shag.
I joined while not revealing my last name but people found me anyway and, boy, am I glad they did!
1 overdrive
Don't get me wrong. The boy holds onto his football almost 24/7. And knows how to put on ESPN. And is in his glory playing outside with his dad.
Finally we have our Gina. Our longest term baby at 36 weeks...just a true blessing to us all. No hospital stays or issues...and loves to be "best buddies" (as she says) to her brother, Kenny.
just as the alarm clock,
ALSO: Find out why you can never EVER go down into the vault of Peter Stuyvesant. And why is the church IN the Bowery, not ON the Bowery?
Scrunge's heart fluttered, and his stomach felt like it had just been thrown off a cliff. Bleek was trying to hijack the shuttle to get back to Earth and Yurruch had lost his grip. They were less than a minute from docking, but with nobody at the controls they would just crash into the Vorgan ship. They would all die!
Professor: Yes. What is night if there isn’t darkness?
It was lots of fun, you can see the conversation in Twitter by searching the hashtag #zombietest - even QLD Rail got involved so you'd know which escape route to take once it was already too late and the city was overcome by zombies.
With a what 10" X 11" size and glossy pages, it's perfect to display on your coffee so you can show your friends that your just not a lush who has beer all over the house, you are a lush who is not afraid to make your own Sweet and Spicy Pork Belly made with Kimchi and is a regular visitor to Brasserie Beck on K Street in Washington, DC to sip on the Kasteel Belgian Ale.
And, like a recent IDC survey, Gartner found Apple is now number three in the cellphone market as a whole.
Alan Jacobs has written a superb biography chronicling the life of C.S. Lewis. Unlike other exhaustive works on Lewis, this one is focused on how his life led him to create the enduring works The Chronicles of Narnia. What enables this boy with a wild imagination who created “Animal Land” to become an atheist? What was the catalyst for turning away from atheism, “…kicking, struggling, resentful and darting his eyes in every direction for a chance to escape”?(129) It was this turn that had the largest impact on the creation of Narnia.
• Finally, someone is taking studios to task for releasing misleading trailers, said Jen Chaney at The Washington Post. “For everyone who ever went to see ‘Knight & Day’ expecting a medieval romance, was disappointed to find out that ‘Rio’ wasn’t a Duran Duran biopic, or thought that ‘Abduction’ wouldn’t stink … this is your Erin Brockovich moment.”
He has personally treated more than 20,000 patients, made a significant impact on more than 100,000 lives as an allergist so far, and earned the nickname “AmazingAllergist” from his patients and peers. His work is rewarded daily with numerous compliments of smiling patients and their families. He has been recognized with various awards, including the America’s Top Physicians’ Award, the Patients’ Choice Award, and the Most Compassionate Physicians’ Award. He believes that every allergic child and individual has a potential to live a great life, allergy-free. His desire to empower allergic individuals translated into this series of books.
And subsequently decrease delinquency in later life
Just something for you to think about-$39.95 is a great price for a pair of shoes! Let me know if you give it a try and find something fabulous! Hope your weekend is full of wonder and amazement!
The debate was sponsored by a so-called: ‘network-of-siblings’ and is to be aired this Sunday, at 10:45 PM. So, I suggest you watch it Dear Reader in your local listings… I will let you be the judge, but let me give you a blunt assessment of what have transpired in that studio, where the debate was held.
Use journaling strips as stems for flowers.
Please note that certain 2’s, 4’s, and 6’s have a “Master Number” associated with their Life Path number; respectively 11, 22, and 33. In Numerology, this is the equivalent to a “special mission” they’ve been sent to fulfill. I’ll cover the Master Numbers at the end of the single-digits, 1-9.Adjustment is your means of getting from life exactly what you wish. You’ll have to meet many changes, opposite opinions, responsibilities, and unpleasant situations. If you face them straight on and adjust wherever necessary, your number promises you satisfaction and you’ll find happiness and contentment. You’ll often play the role of peacemaker because you have the understanding and patience to see both sides of a dispute and help the involved parties come to some mutual agreement. You can see through the clouds of disharmony, find a meeting ground for both people, and point out the pleasant side of their relationship. You’re wise in that you use diplomacy and persuasion, rather than force, in bringing about a solution.
The Woodcarver DVD: Sandy V
together for a bigger impact.....
As far as classes were concerned, to create these two, it was easiest to make Drizzt as a Hunter (he is a ranger and we cannot forget Guenhwyvar!) and Cattie-brie as a Rogue (they can use bows and the armor choices fit best).
Now I juggle a 4-year-old and a preemie with medical appointments out the wazoo.
(Tune in next time for Miss Applesauce Pants and the Exploding Diaper Band Go Fishing)
Last year in November 2011 I thought I had a break through, a lady from America with an E-Publishing company signed me on. Immediately I thought, “Yup, fame and riches” suffice to say that was a fantasy. My connection with her lasted 6 months and last month she liquidated her business because of personal reasons.
What we imagine love to be has never been rooted in reality.
I wanted to take a moment to say,
Date: May 21, 2010 1:56:51 PM
When they arrived, something that apparently had been between us and the edge of the woods, and it couldn’t have been more than eight or ten feet from us, took off into the woods. And it was massive. It was a large animal or something, and we’re not talking a little armadillo or something. This thing was big, and it hauled into the woods.
Publication Date: May 5, 2009 (one day after my birthday)
Friday: 3 miles easy at 9:00 pace
Maybe that one atom is responsible
But removing the sound from the living room doesn't address the heart issue. So we memorized scripture. Even the five year old can remember
I have tasted components of this wine before, but not the finished item. See earlier postings). Medium colour. Some fresh vibrant fruit on the nose. Nicely rounded palate with good spicy, berry fruit and Roussillon sunshine – much appreciated on a grey day in London. Beautifully balanced and very accessible. A blend of 95% Grenache, with 5% Carignan.
I'm waiting for a statement from Commissioner Kelly on this probe. The man has been talked about as a potential 2013 mayoral candidate, and a wide-ranging corruption scandal could taint his current popularity. A Village Voice story from last year examined Kelly's record against his popularity, suggesting that he stood to make a run for the city's top spot, despite a streak of authoritarian and opaque policy. Trouble seems to slide off him like grease from Teflon.
Servings/week: Skinless/boneless 1 can Traditional 3/4 can
Episode 14 Recap:
a little gift of "guilt free" French bread and sugar is headed for your doorstep,
Several months ago, Lewes District Council in East Sussex tried to address the problem of inadvertent place-name titillation by saying that “street names which could give offense” would no longer be allowed on new roads.
There are a few things we've done to make it feel more like a room at a bed and breakfast than a catchall room that you sleep in, that is if you can find the bed! First off, we gave the television in our room the boot! We haven't had a TV in our bedroom since 2005 and frankly, we haven't missed it at all. If we ever want to watch some Boston Legal or Netflix, we just bring the laptop into our room and voila, TV without a permanent TV! We are able to spend time reading, snuggling and catching up on our day instead of zoning out in front of the boob tube.
It was quite strange being the only customer seated, with only 3-4 other people coming in to buy a cup of coffee or some cakes to go. But I guess I can somewhat blame the time of day..? Yes, let’s blame it on the time. I was there at around..4?? So students were just getting off school and people were still at work.. We’ll let this one pass. It definitely doesn’t reflect their products in my opinion.
with smooth glide track
HIS Royal Highness the Prince Regent hath, in the name and on the behalf of the King, signified to my Lords Commissioners of the Admiralty the royal pleasure, that the Uniform Clothing at present worn by the Flag Officers, Captains, Commanders, Lieutenants, Masters'-Mates, and Midshipmen of His Majesty's Royal Navy shall be altered in the manner undermentioned, namely:
He loves to build and create things.
We had a lot of fun with the letter B. Eli gets excited for Kate to nap in the mornings so we can get to work. This is what how we did school this week...
Sentiment - from Dawn Bibby - Woodland rabbits set
We continued to add short shelves (they were longer, but we cut them to the exact length we wanted with a circular saw) on the sides, under the hanging poles. These shelves are a little bit hard to access, but I think Calvin's determination will help him get to the stuff. Or, he can ask me to get things, which he does sometimes.
Licking skull eye sockets
Ethics should also be reviewed. Often. That way you remind yourself of who you want to be, and see if part of your ethical code is unattainable or too outlandish. So I will be writing my personal ethical code in my Book of Shadows. I wish I had done so sooner. But as painful as the lessons are that I am learning right now, I know I will be a stronger and better person for having gone through this period of time. I won’t be sharing my ethical codes with you. It’s personal and for my eyes only. But if we ever happen to meet face to face, I hope that you will be able to look in my eyes and see I am a good person whom learns from his mistakes and is doing the best to be the best possible person he can be.
There are many foundations upon which our spirit as a family is built; respect, dignity, communication, and honesty come readily to mind. Sometimes we falter because all four of us are learning and growing together, but at different speeds, making authentic communication challenging sometimes. For the most part, though, we tend to "groove" along fairly well.
My life is four walls of missed opportunities poured in concrete molds.
She said: ‘I want you to end my pregnancy, and I’m counting on your help with this.’
I am now scheduling a one week tour for the paranormal YA novel Hurricane by Jenna-Lynne Duncan
The drug is claimed to be more effective than any other drug currently available. The recommended dosage is one pill a day for three days, which is less than other for other drugs. Ranbaxy has also ensured that the price remains low at Rs. 130 for the three-day treatment. It is interesting to note that this is much cheaper than Cipla’s Mefliam Plus, which is priced at Rs. 300. Ranbaxy gets more points also because Mefliam Plus is a combination of artesunate and mefloquine, both of which are known molecules that have been used in different fixed-dose combinations previously.
I started with a Sketchy Thursdays sketch for this layout. The papers, letter stickers, tree and border stickers and journaling card are all from Echo Park. The twine is from The Twinery. The number stickers are American Craft Thickers. The buttons are from my stash. The white cardstock (behind the tree) is from Recollections.
One routine that must be particularly strange to watch involves me putting my hand down the front of his shirt so that I’m touching his skin while my other hand clamps down hard over his eyes. “Tighter, tighter!” he whisper-commands. It’s hard to know how hard to push. I fear shoving his beautiful big eyeballs into his skull, and my hand can stay clamped like that for only so long before it starts to cramp.
No, because physically it is indeed rather demanding. I like healthy food and a good night's rest, two things you do not get when you are constantly on the road. I am not exactly rock'-n-roll i guess. I slept on the crew bus because on the bus of the band there was no room. And also because they wanted some privacy. It is important to have some space to your own. The crew called me Anne Frank because I always stayed in my bunk. I do like a good party, but when I am tired I need my sleep. I was usually the first to go to bed.
"The common man in the United States has understood the influence that general prosperity exercises over his own happiness, an idea so simple and yet so little known by the people. He has, moreover, become accustomed to regarding this prosperity as his work. So, in public fortune, he sees his own, and he works for the good of the State, not only by duty or by pride, but I would almost dare to say by cupidity.
I am blessed to have family who consider me on Mother's Day as an "expectant mother." I am, after all! Don't you know I'm paper pregnant?! My parents surprised me by taking care of our spa day on Saturday (more to come on that), while my sister and Lee gave me a sweet card and precious guide to making memories with your children! Perfect!
7) Additionally: Will the Brooklyn Paper be involved in producing Brooklyn Tomorrow?
The first little peek I am going to share with you is the darling 'pocket calendar' I created with this mini-album. I immediately knew the 8 page (5 chipboard and 3 acrylic) album would create a great calendar with cute little pockets which could hold a little card to list reoccuring dates I needed to remember...that I could pop in my purse. However, I am a girl who LOVES my embellishments...so by the time I finished my creation process it was pretty clear this not-so-little guy will now be sitting on my desk. :)
Our fabulous sponser this week is:
Her soft cheeks, not quite smiling
How Ho’oponopono actually work?
Sales alone can save you money. Coupons alone can save you money. But they’re at their most powerful when combined. This may mean waiting a few weeks after your initial clippage, but trust me, it’s worth it.
It’s personal for those without a job. A May 3 report by CNN Money, “The 86 Million Invisible Unemployed” said, “There are far more jobless people in America than you might think.” This is a good reason why you should ignore the government statistical reports on unemployment. They are rigged.
-Jim Webb
So, I was going to say that Johnny was grateful for me, and that is why he grabbed me and slowly reeled me back in to the car. But that spontaneous digression I just took about me being suddenly grateful for life anew- and thus automatically attentive to wearing seatbelts- that is an even better fit with where I was already going.
The owned press railed of course and the state militia looked to me and others unfavourably, yet it was not until I had children myself that my fears became more manifest, I could see, see clearly by then the state of this nation, determine as I had not done so before just who it was that ruled the roost. I became aware that the non-indigenous upon the street were just as much victims as we and that it was the power of money and that alone that destroyed all nation states. Of course in discovering such one endeavours to look to who it is that wields such power, who it is that commands and controls, who it is that destroys all for profit. I became aware of Jewry, are we allowed to say that now, even amongst fellow nationalists, have we become so cowed that such a truth must never be uttered, certainly upon the street, upon the owned street, such terminology is archaic, of another time and so those who for good or bad wield extraordinary power go unremarked upon.
First up was this classic by - I’ve since learned – John Denver. Titled “Daddy please don’t get drunk this Christmas”. Really. I couldn’t help myself. I looked up the lyrics:
Happy Independence Day to everyone who actually made it to the U.S. and survived. I hope it was worth the effort. Some of us seem to have forgotten what we've got and don't want to share.And just remember that you cant do what you want in a lot of places in the world. This dreamland country of ours is flawed and going down hill fast. This Rome is burning........the powers that control us are insane and watching it burn.........but if we all pull together, we can douse the fires and make this country strong again. We can have our dreams here.
Sugar Free
Oh, you ask, did you say swimming? Even though you just said that it was cold as shit, and that you and the OG were wearing sweatshirts and jeans/long pants all day long? Even though I'd be hornswoggled if you told me that it broke 63 degrees?
So I will continue to ask hard questions, and pray for the strength to receive hard answers. And I will seek to continually depend on the Lord, because I can’t trust in Uncle Sam, nor in my own confounded mind-this I realize more and more each day. In the words of Mr Stephen Colbert: I am America: And so can you!
Then the nurse kept coming in and having my lay in different positions, because the baby was in some kind of distress... Then at 2am she checked me and I was 7cm, and she woke up Josh. I was excited it was almost time. I was progressing quickly. But then the nurse came in about 20 min later and said I have to have a C-section! WHAT! Are you serious. Then about 5 min later all these people came in, including my OB Doc. I had to sign this waiver. Then off they ran rolled me to the operating room.
"Don't feed the trolls. This is as fake as fake could be."
Project Life 4 x 6 cards by Lori Whitlock
This beauty belongs to the element wind and is assigned to the 6th, 7th and etheric (8th and above the head) chakras. Colors varies from pale to deep grape purple. The Amethyst has been viewed as a gem of royalty and priests dating back to the B.C.time line. It’s meaning “not drunken” derives from the Greek language and it was obviously believed to prevent drunkenness, along with the power to calm anger.
(Us as kiddos 1995)
Carnivale
Shakeology is a delicious, yummy treat for breakfast. My chocolate shake in the morning truely tastes like a dark chocolate Frosty. It is gluten-free, using all natural ingredients, and low on the glycemic index. I know of people using it who have had their diabetes improve, digestive and IBS symptoms improve, and cholesterol improve.
Here in the United States, those who self-identify as religious tend to be exactly the opposite of their British counterparts when it comes to politics. As the Pew Research Center recently discovered, “Most people who agree with the religious right also support the Tea Party” and its ultra-conservative economic agenda. Summing up the situation, scholar Gregory Paul wrote in the Washington Post that many religious Christians in America simply ignore the Word and “proudly proclaim that the creator of the universe favors free wheeling, deregulated union busting, minimal taxes, especially for wealthy investors, and plutocrat-boosting capitalism as the ideal earthly scheme for his human creations.”
I've been going to make this little pressie for a very long time...like, for over a year! I wanted to say a thank you to my lovely friend Helen's hubby, for loaning her to me for a visit. Was going to do it after her last visit but haven't managed to get organised, so this time when she went home I was determined to make sure I did something to send!! Still took me a few weeks but at least we're not a year down the track this time :)
This week I stopped 10 miles in and ate a pinacolada mule bar. 47g of carbs, 254 calories… should keep me going I thought. I bit into it and it was tough to eat. It was sweet and actually quite tasty, but it was quite heavy and there was far too much. I didn’t fancy trying to eat the mango one as planned at 20 miles. I ate the whole pinacolada mule bar, and decided if I had them in future I’d cut them in half to eat (at 10, 20 and 30 mile intervals).
First and best, is the Star Wars sheet.
Another thing.... I just couldn't face my Father... my mother, or Rene and tell them, I need to be a woman.
In a 1-cup or larger microwavable glass measure (or in a small saucepan over medium heat), heat the sugar and lemon juice, stirring often, until the sugar is dissolved. Do not allow it to boil. Cover it tightly to prevent evaporation.
Clinical Trial
More than anything, though, it was just so special to spend that time with Rain and her family. After being a little overwhelmed to start with Felix had a ball of a time – he loved Arthur’s antics and Gaius’s friendly smiles, and after a couple of days was even happy for Rain to hold him (he’s much pickier about that than he used to be!). He was beside himself with excitement every time he glimpsed their sweet black cat and even managed to pat her once. All the new-to-him toys went down pretty well too. I really hope they visit us in Norway one day. We returned home refreshed and nourished – and not just from all the chocolate cake.
Now, pin as shown bellow. These pins are just to create handy reference points. They go only through the single layer of the top Outer Skirt:
Winter loves her sister but feels a little stifled by her overprotectiveness. That said, she understands their parents death has made her sister this way. Grief affects people differently. It’s made Winter numb and left Lucy raw. Deep down she appreciates the sacrifice Lucy has made in postponing her studies and returning to Hagan’s Bluff to care for her.
The Flowers of the Month series is still going (February is in the works right now), and I hope to get the Three Pillars finished as well. My goal though, in the end, is to have a body of work that can coincide with the stories we all know so well, the stories of the Bible.
a silent bearer of a rose.
So, yes, earthling producers, you can have galaxy rights.
CAKE TIME!!! We got him a half dome cake that looked like the sun because he is so bright and has such a bright future. (didn’t think of this till now, sounds good LOL). Dominic was VERY dainty when it came to his cake. He didn’t know what to think in the beginning but after he got a little taste of the cake he was a little more interested. I even had to help him out by putting his hand in the cake and help him out. Then he itched his eye with his frosting covered hands and got frosting in his eye. Poor kid! After we wiped his eye off he was fine for a little bit long and then was done. Grandma proceeded to give him a quick bath, which wasn’t very easy because of the frosting (apparently it wasn’t very skin friendly).
Have a warmth for all of humanity
Also...if you're interested in joining the blog tour to help promote these cards and Hands of Hope, send Amy an email and she'll get you set up. amy@litfusegroup.com
When the team broke up in 1914, Robinson approached a big-time manager named Marty Forkins with a unique proposal. At the time in vaudeville the “two black rule” was in full force; African Americans were seen on stage only in pairs. Robinson proposed to become the first black solo act. In addition to being socially groundbreaking, the move had the virtue of being a very good gimmick, a must in vaudeville, and so the two forged ahead.
A metal detector is quite a sophisticated device. To get any real use out of it-or have any fun with it-you’ll need to learn a bit about how it works and how to get the best results from it.
Being late for the church, watching the vicar’s frown as he proffered me an umbrella to keep the rain off. (I’d already been warned not to be late and we were 10 minutes behind now!)
$0.99 W Paper Plates 72 pack – with in-ad coupon – limit 3
A simile is similar (ha, punny) to a metaphor except that it uses "like" or "as" within it's description. So it might be "As yellow as sunshine" or "thin like a spaghetti noodle". You get a similar 'show', but you use 'like' or 'as' to help you make the point. You are saying something is MUCH LIKE something else. They can get complex as well, for instance "She made me feel as light as laughter and as bright as sunshine" or "the feeling of hatred was as thick as peanut butter" Now, there are some exceptions to the 'like/as' factor of similes, but I'm not going to get into that because I don't really get it. For me, understanding that if I use "like" or "as" in a comparison description, it's a simile.
The prophet Malachi spoke of the same thing in Malachi 3:2. “But who may abide the day of his coming? And who shall stand when he appeareth? For he is like a refiners fire, and like fullers soap.” He will take away the refuse, the dross. That should spread fear into every heart.
* Paper Flowers, Buttons & Floss from my stash
to a taxi driver in New Zealand
Low Testosterone: Testosterone increases sex drive. As men age, their testosterone levels may decline slightly. Not all men lose the desire for sex when their testosterone levels drop — but many do. Because women have testosterone in them also this could affect them as well.
Rejection and self-pity have been told to go
My very bestest friend who I've known since I was 8, has also been diagnosis with thyroid cancer. She's had her surgery and just in the middle of her radiation treatment. She had to be in isolation for 7 days for taking her radiation pill. She probably have to have another surgery to remove more tumors that were found and were waiting her hear about how well the radiation worked. But between this and Marianne I just can't do anymore bad cancer news. And throughout all these events I just keep thinking of how perfect the plan of salvation is and that God knows me and each of us and that my family can be together forever no matter when we might die and leave this earth. Like Marianne once told me "all I need is my faith".
A pre-made scrapbook page is a dream to me. I don’t know about you but I love to get a page ready to simply add my pictures and put into my book
Skin blemishes are eye sores for those who have it. It is easy to remove skin blemishes! Drink more water to release toxins and hydrate your skin, Lemon extract is a good skin blemish remover too. Stop using harsh peeling soaps. Not all skin types are the same.
First of all, we should pray, for there is great power in prayer. James tells us that the prayers of a righteous man avails much. I hope every Christian will pray daily to God for peace, if it be in accordance with His Will.
Local man Ken Wilkinson repeated this nonsense on the Stephen Nolan radio show a few days later.
It's Wednesday already? This week is flying by which is a good thing. Sorry I haven't posted it's been a hectic week this week and in all honesty I didn't know what to blog about. I have a lot of things on my plate at the moment and I'm trying to mentally deal with it all. My stress levels are through the roof and I'm trying to remain calm and not have an anxiety attack.
I took up the study of science in order to find certainty. No ... to make the lack of certainty more manageable. Towards the end of the novel and his confession Freddie concludes that the reason he had been able to murder the maid was that he had failed to see her as a real person, had failed to imagine her properly:
Have you kept re-visiting Starbucks since they began this policy? Has it changed the experience for you?
Dr. Ambedkar’s observations were true, made on the basis of some of his own painful experiences, when way back in 1918 in spite of attaining high educational qualifications he was not allowed to drink water from a pot ‘reserved’ for the high caste professorial staff at Sydenham College of Commerce and Economics in Mumbai. Dr. Ambedkar realised then that education had not succeeded in bringing out the desired attitudinal change in most of the “upper” caste people towards Dalits. “Upper caste” in village or city even with the highest degrees shared the same mindset when issues of Dalits emerged.
My whole week seemed to be involved with food. My nephew and his son are putting a new roof on my neighbor’s house. Now wouldn’t you think that I should cook lunch for them? The first day I learned that my nephew was not feeling well and went home. No one should be on a complicated roof if you are not fully aware. So I told his son and another employee that I had never met that they could come for lunch. My cooking, however god or bad, sounded superior to their peanut butter sandwiches. I had baked an apple pie with crumb topping and had scalloped potatoes , meatloaf, hot rolls and fresh frozen corn from my freezer. They were very appreciative, especially of the pie. Besides that, the unknown employee cleared the table while I was finishing my pie! He was possibly feeling guilty about eating two pieces of pie. The next day Mark was back (maybe he heard about the pie.) I noticed they were all working so I baked another pie and went over to tell them that they could come for lunch again. They told me they were planning on leaving early, because of threatening rain and they could not tear any more roof off if it were going to rain. Now what is a diabetic going to do with a pie with sugar in the filling and the crumb topping. So I told them to come over when they finished and eat the pie. I did not have to twist their arms. The next day they were back. I told them to come for lunch but no more pie! We had mashed potatoes, gravy, minute steaks, beef and noodles, garlic toast and more corn. For dessert they had to be happy with left over sugar cut out cookies, shaped and decorated like pumpkins. My daughter had asked for 4 dozen for a church celebration at her church. She got the choice ones but my roofers were very content with the left overs. It was a pleasure to do it because they were so appreciative of the food and ate like threshers used to. It was a magic occasion for me.
earn nothing. They put you in the red.
For the second time in three days, Celeste Murphy pretended the plaster pieces that fell on her face as she tried to sleep were snowflakes. This time, inaudible shouts accompanied the stomping. The intrusion on her ears and face took her from a snow-filled dreamland to reality.
Personally, I'm happy to consider myself a relative child in tango. Knowing there's so much more to learn is a big factor in keeping me interested and pushing me forward. When you're already a master, where else is there to go? What else to discover? (Hint: if your answer is "a lot" then guess what--you're not a master).
Previously, I had only written stories that took place during the summer. I was totally intimidated by the idea of having to create the school setting—all those kids and teachers and classes, etc., etc. (not to mention having to return to my own memories of junior high).
So, I gave her eyes my own eyes to take,
Neither sex nor age led anyone to be spared the killing of Dorothy Bruxner-Randall in March 1954 was followed swiftly by that of four year old Andrew Stephens, hacked to death with a panga in April 1954 and 83 year old Dr Charles Pentreath who died in a similar manner a fortnight later.
Once the glue had dried I began to shade and distress the paper using Versamagic Chalk inks. I started by going around all the edges with the "Sea Breeze" shade. I let it blend quite far in to the paper, letting it spread for about an inch in from the edges. next i did the same (working around the edges) with the "gingerbread" shade, but I only let that blend in from the edge for maybe a centimeter (I am mixing my metric with my imperial here) So I can still see some of the sea breeze showing . The gingerbread shade adds a sort of rusty aged look. (if rubbed along the edge of torn paper it can give a nice scorched burned look too.). Lastly I used the "Jumbo Java" shade to lightly rub along the very edge, so that it only just shows up. The chalk inks have a really nice gentle soft look about them and blend beautifully. I hardly get a project done without using them at some point.
BATHING SUITS
The weather outside may be frightful, but the cocktails inside are delightful. I know, I know, I should keep my day job. I could not resist as it was humming through my head.
Clogs. Fucking clogs. Sucked in by their comfort and functionality, I didn't have a chance.
It was a long long drive, but it was sort of fun. It was nice to get away from the crazy and be alone for a few days. I had a couple of good books on tape to listen to and I was able to stop and see the sights whenever I wanted to. In fact, I stopped here: (Jeff would NEVER have gone along with this one)
She was a bright light to all who met her and she changed more lives in 10 months than most of us do in years!
Do I prefer getting or giving?
Nelson Sauvin Pale 4.7%
Anyhow, once the wait is over and the final moment of action arrives, don’t expect my rehearsals to bear any fruit for you’ll see me blabbering even when asked to spell my name. I know, it sounds crazy to forget how one’s name is spelt just because someone asked you this over the phone. I mean, even kids in kindergarten would do a better job than me in those moments.
Each, a nude woman’s shape
John's working in Minnesota.
Over time, of course, language shifted the adjective away from the concrete and into the abstract. By the sixteenth century, bittersweet was used differently, associated more with simultaneous feelings of pleasure and suffering or even pain. Here too its usage has become widespread. Perhaps we have even cut to the quick of the contemporary human condition. After we bundled together to form cities and flirted with the fleeting idea of civilization, only then did we learn to savor the double-edged sword that is the bittersweet. Though some of us may have just fallen under the spell of the falling snow.
Whilst studying the beer list at the festival, my eyes were drawn to a beer that struck me as an interesting concept and one that I definately needed to try.
The rain has continued now for the past two days and while it brings much needed moisture to the grounds it dampens any enthusiasm for one to go outside (pun intended). I’m ok with it at this time though as it supports my choice to get something accomplished indoors, chores around the house being one option. It also supports me spending some time blogging, which is getting sadly neglected and in dire need of a boost.
"The Little Boy in the Striped shirt"
Just like in ancient India.
I love the nostalgic myself. I hope we never lose some of the things of the past. –Walt Disney
In kisses
This is the shell of the old Van Slyke Castle (also known as Foxcroft), built in the early 1900s, then passed along through family hands until it was sold in the late 40s, then abandoned, and eventually torched by vandals in the late 50s. (more about the history of the house here and here.)
I suppose I admire these types so much for I do not have much Warrior of my own. My Jungian psychoanalyst once commented I badly needed to develop my Warrior. Truth is, when I have encountered times for Warrior energy, I tend to cave in and wuss out. This is shameful to admit of course. But facing a deficit is the first step towards remedying the problem.
After hearing Jeni speak, sampling some of her ice cream (delicious!), and buying some of her books (she signed them in hot pink Sharpie!), I was so excited that I came home and immediately started making a double batch of vanilla ice cream.
205) memories carved into my mind of the wonderful week my sister just spent with us
AH:I would say that I'm quiet like Solange but snarky like Lucy.
This was not an easy decision to make, and I do hope that there is a level of understanding about this. We had to do what we thought was the most fair to the most people.
It has been an eventful 24 hours.. I ended up coming down with a stomach virus..While it was NO fun.. I was very grateful to have contracted it once home and not in China!! My husband is so wonderful, he stepped right in and managed everything while I was laid up in bed.
Cassette
they think it is God
oh why not – this gloom has no power over me
05 - Saddle Tramp 09:07
Black cardstock & glitter paper from my stash
Our governments - but most energetically, the governments of the United States and the United Kingdom, have deliberately sought to deny us respect, care, and treatment. Why? The insurance lobby. The cost of treating us. Making a name for themselves. Pathetic, pitiful reasons to ruin the lives of so many. Read more>>
Apart from the deer hunt, bodies start turning up resulting in new questions to be answered. With new investigating to be done, Shardlake lands in inevitable trouble, of one sort or another. He follows the twists and turns, coming up with a few red herrings, but all the questions are resolved with a satisfactory conclusion.
Murder One by Robert Dugoni
The Scriptures have many references to Jesus - and the powers of evil - using the metaphor of light and darkness. Jesus says in John 3:19-21, “Light has come into the world, but men loved darkness instead of light because their deeds were evil. Everyone who does evil hates the light, and will not come into the light for fear that his deeds will be exposed. But whoever lives by the truth comes into the light, so that it may be seen plainly that what he has done hasbeen done through God.”
Another thing I am hoping to accomplish at this dinner is to help some of you overcome a phobia. Smoked beer. I love it. Before I had it the right way, I was afraid of it too. But after a day in Bamberg, where smoked beer is king, I was forever hooked. I have a hunch that there are a few more folks out there ready to be converted. And in case you are skeptical, I was with a group of 28 people in Bamberg, and EVERYONE fell in love with smoked beer on that trip. Trust me on this one. Just open your mind, dig into some spaetzel goulash, and gulp down the rauchbier. You can thank me later.
20) “I am ______”
This chili bean sauce (this brand is the one I happen to use) is the spiciest thing in my kitchen, which is saying something because I have things like habanero peppers and Kolhapuri chutney in my kitchen as well. But the chili bean sauce has a fiery and rich taste that adds incredible flavor to many of my Chinese-inspired dishes. Use only a small dab of it or you will have a coughing fit with every bite. This brand does contain MSG, but I personally don't have a problem with using MSG every once in a while, especially in such small amounts.
﻿﻿Speaking of which how about this fabulous creation that my friend makes at Cakes by Fairies. What's not to like about this work of art? Flowers are so last season darling! Hit the 'like' button on her Facebook page if you think her creations are stunning. Or not - that's fine too. They taste as good as they look - so many people churn out novelty cupcakes of equal visual standard but most, much like French car manufacturing, are style over substance.
Sweet and Spicy Pineapple Pulled Pork Pizza
Me: So Birthday Girl, what would you like for your Birthday Breakfast?
They were miraculously delivered from Pharaoh’s army through the Red Sea; food and water were provided in the desert, though there was little-to-no natural food or water in that desolate place; shoes and clothing did not wear out during years of desert wandering; God’s very presence continued with them in the cloud by day and the pillar of fire by night; they were protected from sickness and disease during their time of wandering as they followed the laws of God.
We did go to charity/thrift shop the other day and I picked up some bits that will be lovely to alter and play with so that is what is on my desk today... I have ideas for each item so that should keep me busy in the coming days now that Mum has returned to France and Chris is off on Thursday to Fort Mac for two weeks.
July 27
Related Bible verses: Genesis 22:;9-12; Ephesians 3:20; Exodus 33:14
Guess I'll have some breakfast instead. Enjoy the rest of your weekend!
Usually, I give myself an allotted amount of spending money. And, because I know myself all too well, I will put a little more in a side account for extras. But I always have the cash to go and I always give myself a budget. ALWAYS!
Knightsbridge School Montenegro encourages creativity and expression throughout the art curriculum and beyond.
The big problem with photographing fireworks displays in Edinburgh is trying to get something that’s not been done 100 times before. This year along we’ve had the half hour display from Edinburgh Castle for the Festival, a shorter display from the castle for St Andrews Day, a display from Calton Hill as part of the Hogmanay celebrations and just over 24 hours later, another huge display from the castle again at midnight for New Year. That’s quite a lot of opportunities with iconic landmarks.
Emma found herself being lifted by powerful hands before her body was draped over a chair in front of the fire. One leg he caught with his hand, making it fall toward the floor, spreading her thighs open in invitation to his whims. Wanton, she felt no anxiety, no threat of remorse. Oddly unshaken by this change of events, she laid perfectly still, perfectly exposed. Instead her body pulsed in need of this man’s, this vampire’s touch.
So, when we went to pick up our grandson, we stopped by Costco and bought the Traeger Texas Smoker. Wow, this does everything but wash the dishes! We can smoke in it, BBQ in it, even bake in it! We had a lot of meat left over from Friday, so we didn't want to smoke more meat yet. So on Saturday we decided to that we just "had" to bake in it.
Now here is where things get interesting. I made a commitment to Flo that I would come and speak. I suppose I could have toughed it out and written something that would have gotten the job done. But I would not have been passionate about it, and 450 people who flew to San Diego to have a good time would have been bored to tears right off the bat, because they would have seen a speaker who was faking it, and that just didn’t seem right. So I course corrected, and asked Flo if I could change the subject to something I AM passionate about - - - passions. Flo, being the amazing woman she is, said “Of course, silly.” And so here we are.
(4) 48 oz. bottles of Wesson canola oil
"Motherhood isn't soft and cozy and sweet; it's selfish ferocity, red in tooth and claw."
Circle of Life
Madre Maria Gabriella’s humble and hidden life was itself a demonstration of the “reasons for our hope.” She contemplated the Face of God in Christ, and offered herself in sacrifice so that all Christians might find in the Catholic Church the place wherein the glory of God shining on the Face of Christ illumines all things and draws them into unity.
Having seen Gus play on a handful of occasions for the academy, I can promise that he certainly is an exciting prospect. As Gary alluded to when quoted, his tackling is an extremely impressive aspect of his game and when taking his age into account, it’s fair to say that he plays with a level of maturity seldom seen in someone so young.
The Boy has been made Deputy Head of his house...again a fabulous achievement. They're both much liked and respected at school, both participate and show the qualities of leadership that will do them well in future life.
05 Welcome To The Machine
This month, I finally got the blending filament I needed for Teresa Wentzler’s Celestial Dragon, and restarted it. I feel like I spent more time figuring out where I went wrong than on actual sewing, and the blending filament is a pain to work with.
His identity remained a sorrowful mystery until 2002, when scientists using the latest DNA technology and dental analysis concluded the exhumed remains were that of Eino Viljami Panula of Finland, who was only 13 months old when he died at sea.
Cut sour cream into biscuit mix, add 7-Up. Makes a very soft dough.
My attempts to get fit in time for climbing the 334 steps of the Clock Tower at the Houses of Parliament were in vain. I was out of breath on the several attempts I had made climbing the escalator on the tube and suddenly the day was upon us and I was no fitter than I had been when the visit was first arranged.
Christi needs prayer, big time. It seems that she has stepped out of one hell into another one. It’s very disappointing when it looks like you’ve made a good decision, and then things don’t quite go the way it looked like they would. We’re not sure, yet, what will happen, but we are trusting that God is going to work this out one way or another. Our God can change the course of rivers and mold the hearts of kings.
I have notice in a number of books involving a societal break down within the United States, that at some point large masses of people move out of the cities into the countryside in a mass exodus. In the case of “One Second After” a large number of people walk all the way from Charlotte North Carolina up into the mountainous Asheville North Carolina with no apparent connection to the area or solid plan in mind.
So, what’s on this time? It’s the episode that introduced robots into the Bionic Mythos, and brings with it the first appearance of 70s stalwart John Saxon in a guest role on the show. “Day of the Robot” pits Steve Austin against a mechanical enemy that’s more than a match for his bionics, and gives us the single longest piece of slow-motion film footage not directed by Michael Bay. The result? About an hour’s worth of nostalgic nerdity.
Guide, O Lord, producers, directors, actors and audiences towards all that is true and good, all that celebrated life and love of God. R.
“I fucking hate you right now”
Though we choose greatly, still to lack
It is you that makes this linky party the fabulously friendly and inspirational meeting place it is.
"Alight Greenie, how’s it going lad?"
I also saw Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows part 2 on Friday and it was also incredible. I saw it in 3D, which just adds to the magic :) It followed the book fairly closely, which I liked, until the very end; Hollywood just can't help but be overly dramatic. But I liked it anyway. In my mind, Daniel Radcliffe, Emma Watson, and Rupert Grint will always be Harry, Hermione, and Ron. They were perfect. I'm really going to miss having a Harry Potter movie to look forward to. I suppose I'm just going to have to buy the rest of them as I only own the first four...Anyway, great movie. If you haven't seen it yet, do!
· Improved energy efficiency, allowing for innovative system designs and enabling more energy-efficient platforms that can meet ENERGY STAR requirements
no material thing in life can make you happy or bring you joy if you can't know happiness and joy without it. but it sure can make you more joyful when you do get it! i'm one who believes we should have some of the things we long for if they are good things, even if they are purely material. so, i am excited and thankful to no end for this blessing! it did not come without sacrifice as well as generosity. and for that, i am all the more grateful!
‘Shoujo Camera’ is scheduled to open in theaters this winter.
Oh keep us like little children who do not know, but expect to know
After the mild winter we've had here in Provence it's ironic to come back from Italy and find our village under a blanket of snow. I really didn't think we'd see any of the white stuff this year. The birdbath scoffs at me:
(Note: In case you forgot to photocopy your documents, do not worry because they do have photocopier facility - 20cents only per copy which is actually all that you need)
U2 Bad IRL
So I thought I'd ask:
” But you haven’t completed the circle,Tee.There’s still a lot you have to do.”, She commented.
In 2010, federal marshals showed up on his doorstep and arrested him on a charge of failing to register as a sex offender.
Yes, the pub scene is changing, but as well as the multi-beer pubs, a guidebook concentrating on beer quality surely also needs to give due recognition to the more traditional two or three beer establishments that for long were the backbone of what CAMRA stood for.
Have I forgotten anything? Probably. But that's still a ton of stuff in common. (!!!) I'll add more as I remember it.
Norma
Out of all three of these train wrecks, what really gets my feathers ruffled the most is that these girls are MAIN CHARACTERS!! A good angst-ridden story wouldn’t be complete with at least one of them making a guest appearance, but as the PROTAGONIST? And authors expect me to relate to this character? Really? Let’s not do this, people, and if you do, please allow these brats to learn from their mistakes. They should set an example of what not to emulate, instead of something young girls should aspire to become. High school is just a blink in the vast scope of life, and pissing people off in the real world will make said life very short.
~ Dar Al Drunkards
I have used my favourite Baby Fairy Flora stamp, coloured her with Derwent Coloursoft pencils. I've used Tim Holtz Vintage Shabby paper. All the embellishments are bits that I have dug out of my stash.
You see she is innocent until proven guilty - and she is being locked up in solitary confinement on Rikers Island. Seems rough. But it was the statement that she was being held in lieu of $2 million bond that got me. She is a mother of four with deep connections to the United States. It is going to be hard to argue she is a major flight risk.
so, how many units were drunk last week?
My followers almost doubled and a big thank you to all my new friends! I hope you chose to follow because you like what you read and not just because you felt sorry for me. I like having regular commenters, because I feel I get to know people a little and am happy to see them comment.
A was lucky. A passing motorist stopped, yelled at the attackers and they scarpered. FB ran over to his friend to comfort and support him.
The Third Board of Appeal dismissed Beifa's appeal. It held that, since the earlier mark had not been declared invalid by the competent German authorities under the relevant provisions of the Markengesetz, it had to be regarded as a distinctive sign within the meaning of Article 25(1)(e) of Regulation 6/2002 (the Community Design Regulation). For the purposes of that provision, an earlier sign does not need to be reproduced identically in a subsequent Community design: it is sufficient that it be incorporated, as such, in that design. What's more, although there were some differences between the design in dispute and the earlier mark, it was possible to discern the characteristic features of that mark in the design, which meant that use of the design in dispute would be in breach of the exclusive rights conferred on Stabilo as proprietor of the earlier mark, under Paragraph 14 of the Markengesetz and that Article 25(1)(e) of Regulation No 6/2002 applied. This being so, there was no need for the Board to rule on the relevance of other evidence relied on by Stabilo in support of its application for a declaration of invalidity, including a judgment of 18 January 2007 of the Oberlandesgericht Frankfurt am Main.
Healing is not a witch’s work. Witches are meant to destroy aberrations. Shamans clean up after the messes they leave. His training as a shaman isn’t nearly as extensive as his training as a witch.
Our discussion Tuesday was on the Heart Chakra, the point of entry to our true spirit! The heart chakra is located in the upper center of the chest and it is in this area we often feel lightness, openness, fullness when we are happy, when we are feeling love and feeling loved.
“Good idea!” I said. It was blustery and cold. Soaking in the hot tub sounded like fun.
And then something happens and “it” comes back and I have to physically deal with “it”. And in my mind I think… Or scream… I GAVE THIS TO YOU TO TAKE CARE OF, WHY DOES IT KEEP NEEDING TO BE ME THAT PHYSICALLY DEALS WITH IT!?!
The inside of the card I decorated accordingly. I used a square paper doily for it and roses from Wild Orchid Crafts.
It's been a while since my last blog, mostly due to the fact that I saved all of my homework over spring break for AFTER spring break, leaving me a nice week of relaxation, followed by a week of hectic homework and studying. Now that I have some free time I can finally write my blog about how incredible my PFT's were 2 weeks ago.
Essentially, this third Matrix film is nothing more than a feeble attempt to tie up some loose ends. The two major questions asked by the audience are: “Why?” and “What?” quickly followed by a defeated “Who even cares?”. In a Return of the Jedi style conclusion, Revolutions gives us both the final battle and final confrontation between the hero and villain. Except ROTJ is both well made and pretty well plotted. This isn’t.
… in investigating content-related competition issues, the regulator should have regard to copyright implications and be able to refer any resulting copyright issues to the relevant minister for further consideration by the government.
Adrian Wu describes himself as a chameleon trapped in an Asian gay porn star’s body. He is petite but adds height with his 8-inch by 8-inch platform heels. His perfectly imperfect hair is tousled to perfection. His effortless black and white attire is not as androgynous as one would expect.
The goal: Tame it.
No one argues that nations should not attend to the basic maintenance of clean air and water. That view predates the environmental movement, but the stranglehold on nation’s economies and the ability to engage in any form of commerce has reached a breaking point. The fact is, the U.S. has made great strides over the years and there are limits to how “clean” the air and water can or even should be. The EPA wanted to regulate “dust” at one point until Congress put an end to that insanity.
Stephanie March, I miss her on television, no let me rephrase that I am missing her from Law & Order SVU. I think that the way she shaped Alex Cabot was amazing, she is everything I expect at ADA to be. Stone cold when she needs to be, a true ice queen who fights for the victims.
There’s also plenty of opportunity to use photo editing packages ( online application FotoFlexer is a favourite)Why not collect all the images together and place them in a PowerPoint Notebook template. These look like sketch books used in many art sessions and these are a close approximation of the same thing in a digital format. Why not have a go?
1 x Camera Bag for Olympus = RM29.90
More research. Meeting models, finding out about their daily lives, and learning about the latest treatments for lymphoma. Also, my internet research throws up the many modelling scams out there, aimed at fleecing teenagers of their money. I’m shocked. That has to go into the story.
An elite team of mercenaries (Li, Statham, Stallone) turn down a contract to overthrow the military dictator of a small South American nation (Zayas). They change their minds when when the drug-runners who are the power-behind-the-power (Austin and Roberts) abduct the dictator's kindhearted daughter (Itie), and they set out to overthrow a government and kill every bad guy they come across--free of charge.
Spending too much time on Facebook.
I hope to hear from some of you fellow DG shoppers and create a Divalicious team. I don't know that Dollar Store and Divalicious should really be in the same sentence, but hey, we can bring sexy back to being frugal, right. Oh, and by the way, they do take coupons there, and I heard they have a new revised coupon policy on their main website. I'm off to check it out, and will be anxiously awaiting to hear from you!
But I could find no example of a major-party nominee whose only experience in government was serving as a governor, but who then made no effort to talk about this experience as part of his appeal to voters for national office. Nor could I find any examples of a governor quitting after one term, knowing he’d lose if he sought re-election, and then running for president.
pride to the local inhabitants and steps have been taken in recent years to
October Afternoon's Sasparilla line is just what the doctor ordered. It's fun and masculine enough for any male in your life. It's very hard for me to find a collection that I can pair with photos of Caleb, so I jumped at the first chance to get my hands on it. I loved all the little journaling cards and embellishments that come with this collection. I was able to pile on some really awesome things and I still have a lot left for some more pages.
Green pasture,
“His end was not only heroic but spectacular in the extreme. It seemed as if he had reserved all his energies until the last, in order to make a fitting exit. Crowds came from far and near to watch his expiring gasps. The youth and beauty of Coney Island were there and its chivalry too, and the flames mounted fifty feet to the sky and lighted up the Atlantic, to say nothing of the palatial residences in the immediate vicinity, there was a general feeling of sadness. Every person in the throng felt as though he or she had lost a friend, and it was a loss of magnitude of which could not easily be exaggerated.
There were 5 or 6 different types and all were priced at between £1.60 and £1.99. Not a bargain for a few cookies by any means but with a bit of paper and ribbon, I made them into nice little stocking fillers.
In terms of food, I’ve been trying to save money/eat everything in my room so I don’t end up with things to take home with me. It is actually kind of fun because it forces new combinations into things.
Warmed up to above -20. Still snowed in. THE WITCH is driving me crazy!!!
St Pauls has been much in the News recently due to the Occupy London Movement.You can read about the ongoing Occupation here
My family tends to favor desserts that aren’t overly sweet but instead have layers of flavor and involve fresh whipped cream, and I was all the more excited to share this balsamic strawberry shortcake recipe with them. On Tuesday night, the six of us sat down to eat together at my table, something that hadn’t happened since my parents last came to New York together three years ago. Since it was the first time in ages that we were all together under the same roof, it was definitely cause for a celebratory meal. My strongest memory of the evening was my mother’s beaming smile, her eyes twinkling as she sat at the table next to my dad and surrounded by both of her children, her daughter-in-law and grandson. I will carry that image with me for a long time.
The management expects the overall retail sector to continue to see signs of softness and is cautious in FY13 but will continue to add 8 stores each year in next three years taking it to total 75 by FY15.
For example, they were required to write thank you notes after meetings with visitors and counseled on how to manage and control their profiles on social media sites like Facebook.
The whole wind and solar business is a gigantic rip-off and will inevitably cause consumer rates to rise for all the reasons cited above. Just as Obamacare is already causing insurance rates to skyrocket, so will the implementation of Renewable Electricity Standards.
The words ‘forgive and forget’ aren’t in Rick's vocabulary. The word ‘regret’ is definitely in Anna’s. So, when they meet again on his book tour of England, it’s an opportunity for closure.
So it was bath time. Have you ever tried to wash Vaseline clumps out of hair!? IMPOSSIBLE! Dish soap, peanut butter, and two beaten eggs later (the eggs worked the best) he was a little less slimy. I think it took a week before it was all out.
Once I stop nursing I'm going to start watching my calories again, in addition to the jogging. So I have a tentative plan in place. So now, I just need to focus on jogging and I need to hold myself accountable. So, here I am starting out:
In the midst of winter, I found there was, within me, an invincible summer.
If you like, pop a spot of grated cheese on top, then bung in the oven for 15-20 mins, until golden brown on top. Serve with salad and garlic bread.
Many folks don’t want to try medications and pills to cure their symptoms. These kinds of medications usually come with side effects and several can even become very addictive. Hypnotherapy is a great alternative to traditional medicines. Hypnotherapy is a great way to manage pain, overcome many different disorders or diseases, and conquer bad habits. Scientifically verified, hypnosis is a great way to produce desired changes in behavior and encourage mental and physical well-being.
I've just realised you can peek another of Mum's paintings ( a portrait of our late cats " Henry and George") in this next shot of my wonderful candle bridge ...we have had this a few years and I love this too........
Coco Before Chanel
And bringing up radio personalities allows me to make a perfect segue in Governor “Pappy” O’Daniel. He originally went by his first name, “Wilbert,” but later figured out “W. Lee” appealed more to Southerners. I wrote recently about how he broadcast his folksy radio show from the Mansion, and about his fondness for inviting the general public to massive parties on the Mansion grounds. 25,000 people, for instance, showed up to celebrate his daughter’s wedding, though only 150 actually made it inside the house.
Immerses into arenas
Kaftan from Roberto Cavalli. A silk-chiffon in bold, bright and beautiful colors that encapsulates everything I love about Italian labels.
Well, of course I didn’t wait until Monday night. I opened the folder and prowled through what’s about to be my new WIP. It took a while to find everything and re-capture the sense of it. So now I am quite excited about it and have been nipping in and out of the document all evening to note down images and lines as they come into my mind. I had sketched six chapters and looking at it after all this time I can see where to begin – and that’s with the sixth one: invisible editing.
Have fun celebrating something!
Almost every time this phrase came along, my student played E-flat followed by E-natural.
Last Fall I did a series of posts on my blog about various "house stations" I set up to help us get control of clutter. One of my favorite projects was coming up with a system to help us organize all of the paper coming into our house. I can't even tell you how much I've loved this filing system! It has made paper control so much easier and my house no longer has random stacks of paper in every corner! I also created a binder to hold all of my "running lists." {Soon after finding iHeart Organizing I took a minute to update my binder with several of Jen's fun printouts}
I really wanted to sort through everything and get it in perfect order before while putting everything back in the units, but now I'm just hoping I can toss out some stuff as I go along and will figure out how to truly organize later ..... as in maybe over Christmas break in December. :D For now, everything is going back in the craft room in any open space I can find or make. Very little is organized at this point with the exception of the new shelving unit behind the craft table.
Teachers threatened by “Why?” or “How come?” may have the wrong job. Siddhartha tried many paths before becoming the Buddha.
-How can you help lessen the worlds sin?
After all that eye candy, those delicious cocktails and divine personalities, it was pumpkin time for me. Yes I was tempted to stay and party the night away, but with another round of cocktails scheduled with some delightful ladies for today, I chose to get my beauty sleep and do it all again. And that my friends, will be a story for tomorrow.
Another week, another set of lackluster stories. Did you guys like anything in particular about tonight’s episode? Leave your TwoCents in the comments below!
I've been reluctant to partition off any part of the space here. Mostly, because the transparent canopy doesn't really lend itself to it, also I would have preferred to let the furniture define the divisions of space. Anyway, I broke down and added a half-height wall towards the cockpit platform, that will be the logical place for a small entertainment center (click on images to view full size.)
I know, you’re probably thinking… “Ah another religious bastard who is trying to teach us the right from wrong”… the truth is I’m just sharing with you my findings, what you believe is up to you. I’m just giving you the facts … take it or leave it is entirely up to you, just make sure you’ve looked inside your soul and are honest with yourself.
At this point I must again emphasize that I am not attacking a specific race of people in this posting, and nor am I suggesting that one specific race is far more superior than another. The information I’ll be presenting here will show that at a certain point in time (more or less 6000 years ago), an unusual being by the name of “Cain” injected a stream of superior intelligence into the human race. This marvellous intelligence boosted mankind’s progress to unbelievable heights, but it came with a price, -- a very wicked, bloody, and gory one!
﻿﻿﻿ I am planting my basil, parsley, lemon balm (in a pot), and a blueberry bush (another damn hole!), after I finish clearing out the herb bed. I am planning on taking full advantage of this long weekend even though, oddly enough, it is also filled with social-type things. Another reason I have to plant all these seedlings is that I need to clear out the laundry room space for...my incubator! Having had no luck finding keets, I successfully bid for a clutch of eggs on eBay. It was reasonable enough that I won't throw myself in the river if they don't hatch. Of course, I am also going to the one final poultry tailgate of the spring on Sunday. This should guarantee that they are up to their elbows in keets. I look at it like wearing both suspenders and a belt. A trait I do NOT find attractive in a man, by the way. Fickle me.
To action!
Getting your projects started is key in this Savage World; that you are no longer just living in, but beginning to own!
Friend: "What?!"
4.) doesn’t matter
"Recently we saw a great rise in both Victorian and Young
- what can I eat for breakfast if I can’t have muesli/cereal/toast?
This is just an issue I find curious and have some thoughts to express about. Academics in the Anglophone tradition are obsessed with policing each other to make sure they are only using active constructions.
Aww, sweet love and....business time.
A one long delicious breath
While visions of meth-labs danced in their heads.
And this change comes from fear and shame. This change means teachers and parents don't have to discuss America's past another bit extra than they already don't discuss it now. It's part of the whole 'Oh, Slavery was so long ago - why even Huckleberry Finn has 'respectful' terminology. So why bring up possible present day effects'
Annika, refreshingly, fares mostly better. Certainly, she’s as slinky and sexy as any Bond girl (Lustbader weirdly starts describing her “mineral eyes” at some point), but she’s also competent. Interestingly, Lustbader’s stilted dialogue actually works for the Russian and Ukrainian characters, since English isn’t their first language. (However, no two grown Russian men are going to use the word “frenemies” unironically. Ever.) As far as the supporting cast goes, I particularly liked Annika’s Dyadya Gourdjiev–her uncle–a genteel and jovial gentleman who is not all that he seems. The supporting cast is actually very well-done, since Lustbader can’t randomly toss out their backstories at the reader. He does, however, manage to give two disposable assassin backstories. You have to admire that sort of tenacity.
I'm kind of excited for this. Valve pushing boundaries again. But still...couldn't I just buy a normal PC then? It's not a real gaming console after all, but rather a PC, made for gaming. I'm looking forward to more news on this.
already weak-sphinctered from the first warmth
Heart shaped pasta with homemade marinara sauce, red heart shaped jelly, raisins, broccoli, lite ranch dip in the Hello Kitty container.
pajamas sans makeup until the afternoon, you usually feel a
You’ve got to realize, we’ve been working with the format and the details of the 2012 conference for months. You never really know how it will turn out until men start filling the seats and the band strikes the first note. As a veteran of PK events since Boulder ’93, I can tell you this is the best season premiere event I’ve ever seen!
Little Roy - Don't Cross The Nation
Tree core samples are compared to form a chronology or an arrangement of events in time. By matching overlapping patterns of tree ring growth dendrochronologists use a technique called cross-dating. It’s this method that has enabled almost 10,000 continuous years of tree growth from living, standing dead and pieces of wood of Great Basin bristlecone pines on the White Mountains of eastern California to precisely be recorded.
And that’s about it. Watch this space for more ballet stuff, my autumn break plans and other nonsense.
"About twelve hours....more or less".
02. Mandragora Scream – A Vision They Shared
Subscriptions to The Bourbon Country Reader are $20/year for U.S. addresses, $24.50 for Canada, and $28.50 for everybody else. It is published six times a year. Well, maybe not, but your subscription always includes six issues.
half of slices on ungreased cookie sheets. Spread
So here we go. I love just about everything about it. I had two things that I want changed for the wedding day. I don't like the light shadow the goes around the inside edge and below my eye. And I also think the black liner is too thick... I just usually only wear liner inside and so it just seemed a little too "not me" for me to get used to. Because my make-up artist is a personal friend, I will be going over to her house one day just to do it again to perfect what I want. All in all, I'm happy with her work and will be enjoying this free friendor for my wedding day.
So cut it short, give her the title if she’s qualified.
5th of January 2012
The pickled watermelon, for 3 dollars, was also pretty good. The Kool-Aid flavor really came out in the few pieces of pickled rind that were on the plate. Additionally, the basil on the dish was really fresh and actually not overwhelming.
30 E. Lake, Room 1105
She smacks that ass again ordering you to turn over so she can see your wonderful massive bulge between your legs. You obediently do as she SAYS.
3. Share 7 random facts about yourself.
wonderfully, after about three years fully emerged on the plateau of
I fly back home today, so this post is my fond farewell to Melbourne. I managed to squeeze in quite a bit of shopping, gallery and museum visiting, eating and coffee drinking in my little visit. A few of the highlights include ...
We all know that Alex Ferguson is the master of mind games, ever since he managed to make Kevin Keegan have his biggest meltdown on TV since the TV series ‘Superstars’. But it would seem that Mancini is trying to play him at his own game.
The apostle wrote in 1 Corinthians 15:3,4, “I delivered unto you first of all that which I also received, how that Christ died for our sins according to the Scriptures; and that he was buried, and that he rose again the third day according to the Scriptures.” That’s what he said he received from the Lord. Do you wholeheartedly believe that or are you still seeking another payment for your sins?
Colours represent certain emotions, characteristics, values or objects; depending on the context. They act as symbols. In this regards, colours act as the ‘the signifiers’ and ‘the signified’ changes in different cultures.
The inaccuracies in E-Verify will hinder businesses and workers alike. As many as 3.6 million workers will be required to miss work time as they try to confirm that they are indeed lawfully authorized to work, and 770,000 will lose their jobs. Such disruption would result from E-Verify’s ongoing inaccuracy and its vulnerability to name mismatches due to multiple or hyphenated names, identity theft, and employer fraud. Mismatches in the E-Verify databases also leave employers still vulnerable to immigration enforcement even if they rely on the program to sort out whether their employees are authorized to work.
Shift powdered sugar into a medium bowl. Add vanilla and enough milk to make icing into a drizzling consistency. Drizzle over baked and slightly cooled cinnamon roll. Resist the urge to sample the cinnamon roll before it gets to the table. Warning: this is nearly impossible.
The prize has three categories:
He is also accused of transferring NFCorp’s funds of RM40mil through a cheque into the National Meat and Livestock Corporation’s account at the same bank from May 6 to Nov 16, 2009.
=p
I can not and will not vote for anyone who has said that they would increase the military’s budget. I can not and will not vote for anyone who wants to send more troops into Afghanistan, and who wants to go kick ass in Iran. I can not and will not vote for anyone who voted to give the $700 billion to the banks who fucked up, and allows corporations to run wild. I can not and will not vote for anyone who approves nuclear power. I can not and will not vote for anyone who does not wish to impeach Bush/Cheney. I can not and will not vote for anyone who will not open an independent investigation into 9/11.
PS - down the shore didn't get much damage at all - the storm really went crazy once it hit up in central/north Jersey - from my neighbors they said the storm was nothing compared to the Noreasterns we get down there ..
Exactly how much of your benefits, which came out of our taxes, did you spend on the fucking lottery, eh? And did you ever feel guilty while you were doing so?
A couple of days later it’s announced to the group they have a new office manager and I have an e-mail saying could I meet CS on Saturday to discuss handover.
“Can I choose not to answer that question?” Shannon asks.
This isn't high literature by any means, but as a non-Star Trek sci-fi fan, I found the stories nicely thought out and well written. If I was more sensitive to that kind of thing, the objectification of the ladies might get to me a bit, but somehow in the context of Mudd, I didn't mind. Also, J.A. Lawrence is a woman, the widow of James Blish, another Star Trek novelist. Sometimes the characterizations were hammered in a little too hard (Spock's raised eyebrow, Scotty's accent, McCoy's bickering), but overall the book lives up to its cover.
Ronald Weinland:
The time that followed is a little hazy in my mind. I do remember that as quickly as it appeared, it was gone. I didn’t look back to see what happened to the great blue heron, and I don’t really remember the rest of the trip home. All I can say with any certainty is that somehow in all this, I did regain my ability to ride downhill. Now if only I could get rid of my fear of swamps.
It’s been an interesting journey for the show, which began in Ottawa in September 2008. It was a smaller show than Capital Slam, the main slam event in town, and BB123 Slam acted as a place where new slammers could get comfortable before hitting the big stage. Notable poets like Sean O’Gorman and Loh El competed in their first-ever slams at Bill Brown. The series ran successfully as a “feeder” show to Capital Slam for two years until its venue closed down. Bill went on hiatus for a while.
3:38: Penny has been crying the whole time. Macie has been awake since about 3:15, but I am letting her lie because she was so cranky this AM and didn't sleep well last night. She's not crying, just singing. Out of the Bath.
- Movin' Out (Anthony's Song) by Billy Joel
Here is the flier:
the chalkboard herb pot is now in grady's room,
As a customer service/project manage/PL/Admin, your job is RESULTS, and people will respond faster to someone they enjoy working with, rather than that old demanding grump. Personality is King. Stuffiness died along side “Life long careers”. Sure, there are times a professionally written email is required, and should be treated with the utmost care…but too many times we forget the current transition in generations. Good bye Baby Boomers, hello Generation Y.
In the first 12 weeks after the earthquake RFF gave away 72,390 meals – about 6,000 meals a week to those in desperate need.
But unless you wanted THIS
experiences, they were meant
Brian Lumley – The Nonesuch
Tanner had grown up in northern California where the insidious undertow could easily pull even a strong swimmer to their death if they didn’t know how to deal with it.
Much like Day of the Dead, the Haitian Vodou holiday Fet Gede is celebrated every year on All Soul’s Day. It’s a day to honor the Ancestors and the group of spirits known as the Gede.
“I used to have a garbage somewhere, but I don’t know where it went,” he confessed.
without further adieu
Please excuse me while I leap onto a chair and scream shrilly while gathering my housecoat up above my baggy biscuit-coloured (and faintly biscuit-scented) tights. Yes, I am the woman from Tom and Jerry. My secret is out.
A total budget of £60 billion has been earmarked, although this may change during the negotiations that will take place in Brussels over the next 12-18 months to determine the actual amount of money available and the criteria to access funds.
I learned that truly, love exists. It may take different forms but it is truly, the kind of love that you know, exists. I learned that one needs love to give a kind of flavor to one’s life. The kind which fuels you to feats unknown to you, the kind of love that moves mountains, gives meaning to your life, changes your very being, the one that changes your heart.
I am the LORD, and there is none else, there is no God beside me: Is. 45:5
This is not the exact table but eerily similar to ours. (and please don't think I have that horrible carpet). In all of it's ugliness I must say. I have sincerely considered throwing them out the front door and to the curb, but I figured with a tight budget I would instead give them a makeover. I hope to have them both completed over the weekend. Lots and lots of sanding still to go.
All it requires… is a little attention… and a little consideration…isn’t that what we all want??
1) Heat the oil and fry onions followed by garlic
Stan has a wonderful inspirational blog.
Ricky Bradshaw is a high-ranking Special Agent with the Federal Bureau of Investigations, and part-time super secret lover of Abernathy Jones. Bradshaw stands 6’2′ and sports trim black hair and green eyes, hinting at a lost Native American heritage. Abernathy often feels that her clandestine love affair with the chiseled Bradshaw would become something more than twice-monthly sushi and sex if only Bradshaw would spend a few less hours in the gym each week. At 39, Bradshaw’s version of a mid-life crisis didn’t involve a sleek $100,00 sports car, but rather a $300 a month gym membership and a 12 pack to make any woman swoon (much to Abernathy’s chagrin).
and in the shadow of death.
Mr Young makes a vat of his famous mulled wine. Well, it’s not actually his. It’s Jamie Oliver’s, with a few alterations. But it’s very good. This year, he makes it well ahead of time, because last year it still wasn’t ready half an hour after the guests started arriving and I had to offer them Diet Coke or water, which didn’t seem to be suitably festive, even with a mince pie.
Rock/Folk American Mat Kearney (incredibly strong Coldplay music and voice influence) is one of the voices of 2011 and he sings “Sooner or Later” in the Zeitgeist 2011: Year In Review.
Men Killed by Jonah - 2 with the shotgun, 2 on the cycles, 2 in the chopper and 2 on the rollercoaster for a total of 8
2010.08.06 Iraq Kirkuk 1 0 Muslim radicals shoot a woman to death.
O LORD GOD! You are God of possibility! Father my income will increase this year by 700% to enable me take care of my needs, the needs of Your Children and the needs of Your Church and still have much more in store, to Your Glory in Christ Jesus, Amen!
touched
Leesa’s question, “What is death about?” haunts me. She’s right — many people do think they know the answer, but there is no way to know for sure, which is why it’s called a “belief” and not a “surety.” I do think there is a deeper reality, I’m just not sure our conscious selves are a part of it. We are so much a product of our genetics, our hormones, our brains (anyone who has had to cope with an Alzheimer’s sufferer or a loved one who had cancer in their brains, and found a stranger in that familiar body, knows how much the brain controls who we are), that I’m not sure how much of “us” survives.
Jesus Christ upon the cross is the image we are to imagine. This image appeals to both sides of our brains. It is concrete, appealing to the right-brain-heart and it is symbolic, appealing to the left-brain-mind. It represents the atonement, the broken heart and the contrite spirit. It also represents godly sorrow for sin. It contains the body of Christ, which is remembered during the bread portion of the sacrament, and the blood of Christ, which is remembered during the wine portion. It contains the wounds in His side and the prints of the nails in His hands and His feet, per D&C 6:37. It is a lifted up Christ, causing one to look up at Him, putting the one creating the image below Christ, in a position of humility. Also, being raised up, it is an ensign, calling attention, or drawing the attention of men to it.
for auld lang syne
Feeling like a failure makes me feel even less like writing. (As does the ABC app on my iPad that enables me to watch every ABC show at my convenience. Revenge. Pan-Am. Modern Family. Happy Endings. That amount of TV is not conducive to works of creative literary genius.)
In summary, in the past two days I’ve walked Tokyo, trained for 2 hours, gone walking and ridden bikes. And tomorrow morning two of us will go running before class and then we’ll all probably walk to the store afterwards.
It has been my experience that folks who have no vices have very few virtues. - Abraham Lincoln
Good and evil doesn’t have a grey zone. Killing and stealing is bad. Violence is never “good” or necessary unless it is used to defend against killers and thieves. Indeed, that is the morality behind the “just war” principle as defined by international laws and treaties.
Absolut Vanilla – 40%
Give us today our daily bread.
Republican and Democratic lawmakers say any increase must include measures to ensure the country’s debt remains at a sustainable level. The debt-reduction debate is a sharp shift for Washington, which less than a year ago was focused on additional deficit spending to lower the unemployment rate.
Lesson learned: next time skip the show and just eat the nachos.
It seemed only fitting to ask for their reaction to the March 11 Memorial Service, as many of them interacted closely with homeowners throughout 2011 and saw firsthand the daily struggles of the Japanese people.
As someone who owns the entire twenty-six issue run of GOREZONE, the recently released compilation THE BLOODY BEST OF GOREZONE wasn't an opportunity for me to rediscover lost memories but yet the many reminisces this issue includes from GOREZONE alumni - including editor Tony Timpone, managing editor Michael Gingold, and contributor Tim Lucas, along with a fond appreciation of the late Chas. Balun from new FANGORIA editor Chris Alexander - couldn't help but put me in a reflective mood about what GOREZONE meant during its tenure on the newsstands and how different the cultural climate is today from what it was in the late '80s/early '90s. It also couldn't help but make me feel too old, but that's another story.
So how is it with you? Are you in “good cheer” or are you still without hope and without God. The good news is the same: “Believe on the Lord Jesus Christ and thou shalt be saved.”
I want to be Rockin’ Around The Christmas Tree
To help make the day extra special for the Ladybug, her Nana Schoo came out for a special visit.
REM Nightswimming US
The group is currently working on a new album due out in 2010.
Twitter Hash Tags
The deaths caused controversy in Northern Ireland when it was revealed that neither of the IRA men had fired a shot during the incident, prompting claims that the SAS had opened fire on the men without making an attempt to arrest them.
- Cheryl Thornton
Having a sister or a friend is like sitting at night in a lighted house. Those outside can watch if they want, but you need not see them. You simply say, “Here are the perimeters of our attention. If you prowl around under the windows till the crickets go silent, we will pull the shades. If you wish us to suffer your envious curiosity, you must permit us not to notice it.” Anyone with one solid human bond is that smug, and it is the smugness as much as the comfort and safety that lonely people covet and admire. I had been, so to speak, turned out of house now long enough to have observed this in myself. (p.154)
Is it possible that you were like Zeke?
Six months ago, she had explained a desperate plan to her brothers. She would apprentice herself to Jasnah Kholin, scholar, heretic. Not for the education. Not for the prestige. But in order to learn where she kept her Soulcaster. And then Shallan would steal it.
Apple Blossoms C Great $7.00
Hello Dolls!!
so i had to leave the photography to the professionals ...
And don’t think that it is only Israel/Israelis who are victim to slander like that, it happens to Muslims as well, and is as despicable in that case, whether it is minarets portrayed as missiles, in order to emphasize a certain notion about Islam, whether it is making portrayals of supposed Muslims raping a woman, killing non-Muslims or whatever. I’m not talking about pictures of for example extremist Muslims, who then are used as spreading the false notion that ALL Muslims are like them, that’s bad enough, but fake pictures of supposed Muslims doing something in some context, in order to spread hatred.
What kind of research did you do for the poems, and how much is fact and how much is fiction?
The limits of my funds were not approached by my child opening these packages of candy that cost only a few dollars. I buy lots of different supplies for my kids to use to create things. Some of which can only be used once. I don't consider it wasteful if my child uses a piece of paper to paint a picture either. And I would say the word "food" applies only loosely to sticks made of sugar and the accompanying packets of granulated sugar.
And if you wanna see my love, just ask her
“Just wanted to admit that i wasted my ENTIRE morning (watching Mixergy interviews and reading articles online is PROCRASTINATION)… I’m admitting this to you because I’m hoping this will force me to be EXTRA productive for 4-5 hours before the Q&A call. No need to reply … and THANKS for holding me accountable…”
(DEF v.2, ch.17, pp.600-610)
It's a McCall's pattern from 1986. Doesn't look very 80's does it? I found it at the thrift store. I've always admired circle skirts on other folks. I thought I'd test out if I liked one on me. It is a full circle.
Ngozi-Okonjo Iweala
½ cup quick-cooking oats
A political coalition is only as good as its common ground and, guess what, denying BN its two-thirds majority is not a long-term common ground. Surprise, surprise — by now none of the component parties in both PR and BN has any more common ground left.
I stamped the adorable little boy (Lost Coast Designs) with Imperial Purple and cut him out. I die cut some flourish style leaf fronds (Marianne Design) and inked these with Fired Brick.
I injured my back (or should I say an old injury came back to haunt me) and starting seeing my Chiropractor in January. I adore her. Plus, I had bronchitis in October into November.
Secondly, there is no such thing as junk food. There may be junk diets, but food either has nutritional value or it does not. Sugar and salt are not only harmless, they are essential.
I try to keep frozen shrimp on hand. Frozen shrimp store well, defrost easily in a bowl of cold water, and are a quick way to add protein to a dish. If using frozen shrimp, place them in a bowl of cold water and defrost in the refrigerator. The shrimp should defrost by the time we are ready to add them to the recipe.
“So just how impressive was her fire?” Paran asked, trying to appear casual.
Now I have my randomized activation roll, but what to do with the figures? A popular approach is to have the automated warband be in a defensive stance, and the actual player’s force in the attack. Personally, if I were to do this, I would not even need a system for them, since most choices would be pretty obvious. I rather device a scenario with very clear objectives for both forces, preferably different goals. And if one of the sides is going to be mildly in the defensive I rather have it be the one I am playing. This way the automated enemy’s choices become more entertaining, making you make the most of what you’re given by the randomizing system.
What will I be running? Well, I’m glad you asked! Obviously, the frame is orange. Very orange. I’ll be going for a fairly clean and simple orange and black colour scheme with the ocassional silver / chrome accent here and there:
"half the people you see these days are talking on cell phones
The series centers around a man known as Donald Draper, or Don. He is a man of immense mystery, and few people try to get to know the real Don Draper. He is brilliant in his work, passionate in his love, and intelligent in his business. That’s enough. Don works at an advertising agency on Madison Avenue, which is at this point in the series referred to as Sterling Cooper Draper Pryce. Roger Sterling, Burt Cooper, Donald Draper, and Lane Pryce remain partners of the firm, hence the name. It has evolved into this; at the beginning of the series it was simply Sterling Cooper. The job of everyone at this firm is to sell to America, to make anything they are given look fabulous. And, amidst all of this working there is a plethora of conflicts among characters, further making the series enjoyable and relatable.
WOOF! WOOF!
Almost everyone who sees the mass decloakings, anywhere on Earth will be
Now I’m growing fresh sprouts. My first attempt was an absolute failure. Sprouts are supposed to take 3-4 days and be vibrant and alive.
The children had so much fun with these simple toys, not only throwing them high into the air and catching them, but also running or swinging with them watching the tail follow,
So, here I am...38 + 2 days pregnant...walking like a duck through my kitchen (that should open my pelvis, right?!), picking up glass, and then trying to get all of the syrup wiped up. And then, I vacuumed like crazy. I just got a Dyson this weekend, so that part was kind of fun! The vacuum worked really well! And then, I mopped like crazy.
While the prose and plot add so much to the story, it's the characters that truly make Don't Breathe a Word one of the best books out there. I don't think I've read a book with such real, messed up characters in a long time. The reader will find themselves identifying with Joy, whether you've ever been pushed as far as she has or not, and sympathizing with May, Creed, and the rest of the gang. Creed is one of the best male leads out there - he's sweet, strong, and so imperfect. He screws up and says the wrong thing and he doesn't have that psycho possessive thing that so many other male characters seem to have lately. Oh, and he plays a guitar. Asher, as evil as he is, is also a great character, perhaps because he is so bad and therefore real.
White on white, no colour other than on the images.
Despite the learning curve, I was able to teach myself how to beadweave in flat, right angle weave using a single needle. The first project states you can make the bracelet in a couple of hours. It took me approximately 5 hours over two days. Not bad for a beginner.
so that’s where I sat with the Night
Like that sundae at the diner that time. Remember that? You asked for ice cream, nuts, chocolate, caramel sauce, maraschino cherries...and sprinkles. Multicolored and chocolate. Oh, and slivered almonds too! Let's not think about the stomach ache that followed. Aftermaths don't matter.
For next time
FEINGOLD: RELATIONS GOOD, BUT HUMAN RIGHTS PROBLEMATIC
We’ve grown accustomed to seeing state power being abused, under past regimes and even more so under this regime. The SoE is still fresh in the minds of many…and now comes the violation of Cheryl Miller….is this what Kamla means by people centred governance? Is this the sort of female-centric governance we should expect too?
The Transfiguration
John-Guitar
I saw him this morning. We practiced unarmed combat in the gym downstairs. I do love it when he, well . . . I broke a nail, and I have to attend a dinner tonight at the Spanish Embassy. Life is full of problems. Sounds like you’re ready for another escape from Tara Hall.
College applications sent. Apartment Promise signed. Articles written and submitted. Those interminable two weeks between le premier et le deuxième tours. Now we are in between, in that god-awful place of limbo, a purgatory of waiting. And as one season wanes and the next not quite sure that it is ready to arrive and assert itself, outside our windows seem some netherworld of uncertainty, a lingering pause, as well. Anticipation in gray. Fingers drum on tabletops or nervously flick from button to button on the remote control or the pages of a magazine; feet pace back and forth across carpets; others stand forlornly at the window, arms crossed, eyes glazed over, staring out into gloomy nothingness until the next ray of sunshine sharply awakens them from their in between stupor.
To make pressure point self defense certification courses available at low cost, with no strings attached.
the craft tables were quiet, so we camped out there.
He lifted her chin and forced her to make eye contact with him. “And you were too smart to be stuck in this town, and just another housewife. You would have become bored and resentful.”
Finally back at the top we are told the bus back to the nearest major conurbation of Latacunga has already gone and that we need to pay an additional 15 dollars for a taxi.
So we were finally on our way out. You could tell that she was excited by the way she jumped up and down. I could almost swear that she was smiling. Truth be told, I was also rather joyous. It was infectious this mood. She had been waiting for the longest time for this day. Okay, I know that this is going to sound pretty paradoxical but as soon as we stepped out of the gate, she looked a bit spooked. I wasn’t too surprised coz I know she doesn’t get to veer beyond the boundaries of the compound too often so she was slowly trying to take it all in. I didn’t rush her.
If you answer TRUE to this, then you are admitting that Christians do not believe all people are equal in the eyes of God, which means Christians discriminate, which means Christians simply by existing as Christians are in contravention of article 1 of the UN Declaration of Human Rights, so artfully inserted by the BBC propagandists on their opening page.
I have been here quite a few times and never had bad service or any mistakes and the food is always tasty and fresh so it gets a big thumbs up from me for a great local Thai Restaurant. BYO wine and beer makes for a great value night out.
Regular readers will know that the longest love affair of my life is with the Olympic Games. It may not be the most ardent – John Taylor from Duran Duran, we will always have 1983 – but it endures after all others have fallen away. An empty carton explodes under the wheels of a car and that sound suggests a starting pistol. Police tape flutters in the breeze and I see the ribbons of rhythmic gymnastics. Birds sing and I hear the national anthem of the old Soviet Union.
And now a POEM …
Possible projects: business idea/consulting idea (this is broken and needs fixing), interviews with people in your field, etc.
Over on the men's side, there was some drama, as a last minute change took place in the Norwegian team! World champion Ola Vigen Hattestad withdrew the morning of competition after complaining of a sore throat. So Oeystein Pettersen steps in and teams up with Petter Northug. And it was a phenomenal race! Germany fought from sixth to lead the race in the first half. And by the second half of the race, Russia was right behind Germany. But in the final meters of the race, Petter Northug sprints past Russian Alexy Pettukov, and then passes German Axel Teichmann and leaves them behind to win the race! A fantastic finish! Germany takes the silver, and Russia wins the bronze.
Sebastian's mom is so touched by everything. She had no idea that so many people from so many places would reach out to cheer up her son.
I was asked to reply Piyush Pandey’s comment and I did but was not carried in the story , so here is my reply
Kim Newman – The Other Side Of Midnight: Anno Dracula 1981
Some other ideas for Mom: magazine subscriptions, wine club subscriptions, a book (50 Shades of Grey for mom, anyone?), a weekend getaway for you both, cookies (Mrs. Fields is my fave), makeup, a cookbook, perfume, gift certificate to store or restaurant, an orchid, etc…….
November (2, I think) 1972
Type System Version=SQL Server 2000;
the brain violently churns
What would you do if you won $640m? The answer I like the best will get a share of my millions when I win. This is the one time in my life I am going to be an optimist.
When I had this as a sample, I barely used it -- maybe because I was afraid of it running out. Now that I have a full jar of it, I can't stop using it! I've always known it was versatile -- but omg... this is LOVE. I've used it as an all-over wash, or as an inner corner colour. Just... so many uses...
Here are a few (but not all) more cards I snagged in the JABO draft. They include my beloved '81s and '83s (I had a couple but needed upgrades); sparkly cards from teams I collect; a much-desired mini from the Lineage collection; and more!
Yet, I can’t. God knows I have tried. Mostly all I’ve succeeded at is realizing that I can’t step away from my expectations of myself. Again, my question is “why?”
I sat in the hot tub the night before he was due back, it was a Wednesday night, I downed a litre bottle of amaretto with 45 tramadol tablets and crawled into bed, hoping not to wake up I slipped into unconsciousness. Late the next day I came to hardly able to move as I struggled to get to the bathroom where I passed out again. At some point my partner returned home, but it barely registered as I slipped in and out of consciousness. On the odd occasion I came round, at first he was being loving and looking after me, unaware of why I was so unwell.
Isn't she the cutest thing! I just love her, she has so much attitude! I tried to copy the little flower in her hair with my Fiskars punch and I couldn't stop putting them on the card. I love how they look on the card. I will use this card for my girlfriend's daughter's birthday. I am so happy with my Copics and I am loving this new turn in my crafting.
We went and visited the Temple grounds
I see spirals everywhere.
Hello, welcome to another Twisted Challenge.
“The List” was one of the most effective and influential chain letters ever. Women love it because it was created specifically for us, we can relate to it and it gives us set goals to reach that we were never given before. This list has been read by millions and has affected each and every woman that has taken the time to sit down and scroll through it. It makes you truly realize the impact that hitting the forward button can have, you can change someone’s perspective on life. So keep sending chain letters! Heck, why did people stop doing this? It makes me want to start sending this list out again because odds are many woman have forgotten about it or younger women like myself have never seen it.
Bonnier Audio AB and others v Perfect Communication Sweden AB, Case C-461/10, Court of Justice of the European Union (ECJ), Advocate General's Opinion, 17 November 2011
We need a new State banking system in each EU country, all independent and sovereign to each country and within the state system, City Banks, localism of finance is essential.
but it's time to return to photography.
My friend makes one LARGE pitcher of formula and then pours the servings of formula into the bags. She then puts each on in a cup and has them in the fridge, so you just pop the Lact-Aid tube into the bag when you are ready. I do 6 ounces at a time since sometimes I mix up formula when out an about and since formula lasts only 24 hours, I don’t want any extra at the end of the day.
(Encore #1)
removed from my life, in Jesus Christ Name! Amen!
My father was born in Jamaica. He was an old Dad, 46 when I was born, and this summer I went to the funeral of his last surviving sister. Their parents, whom I never met were married in Edwardian times, my Grandmother, Teresa’s parents, my great grandparents, were born in the 1860s. It almost boggles the mind. There is more. If you think that just thirty years earlier, slavery still existed. My great great grandparents, most probably, belonged bodily to someone else, could be bought and sold.
The title of the article is carefully chosen. “Die moer in” is an Afrikaans expression that one cannot directly translate. It is also cursing.
Okay, this book is just awesome. Granted, when the alternative is working on a Sunday, it doesn’t take much to keep me engrossed. That being said, Evan Munday’s The Dead Kid Detective Agency kept me giggling all afternoon. I kept promising to read “just one more chapter” before getting back to work, then picking the book back up. It was just so much fun to read!
Anyways, I am currently reorganizing and purging my scrapbook area. You'd think it would be easy, but there's alot more to it than you would think! At least to me there is. Things like organizing your papers, stickles, stamps, punches, etc. The better organized, the more visible my products are, the more likely I will use them and not forget about them.
EMOTION
3.) They have to hook her up to all kinds of wires, which directly relates back to point two.
Who is Hawkeye? If you haven't read many Avengers comics, you might not have a good handle on his character. After all, he has never been able to support a solo book, he's never been a particularly prolific guest star, and he hasn't really done much of anything in the last ten years other than die and come back as a ninja (sigh). But it's absolutely vital to understand two things about him: 1) he's not Green Arrow and 2) he's kind of an asshole.
Wednesday – Chicken and dumplings
Friends would choose our house because of her hospitality and love for each person who walked through our front door. People would fall asleep on our couch because she made our home a house of peace and rest. She is feisty yet gentle. She is gracious yet firm. She is the woman who taught me how to tie my shoe and how to know the Savior.
nestled by ink soaked toes
Really love this Grand Jungle Animals mobile from Blabla. It's the priciest of the bunch, no doubt a result of each little circus animal being hand-knit by Peruvian artists
Layout
What would you say is the best and/or worst part about being a writer?
NOW. We want to see your projects! If you decide to share your own project, I've included the link tool at the bottom. Just make sure that in your own blog post you link back to all four of the hosts: me, Katie, Sherry, and Cassie. And you can even put the banner in your post, too, to make it really legit. Here's how you link up:
Long story short, I placed my order on
One part of who I am as a reader today is because of Reading Rainbow and for that, I am grateful to the show and PBS for airing it for so long.
Fastnachts (doughnuts)
The winter season is prime time for incidents like this to happen – specifically post snowstorm. Manhole fires and explosions are caused by salty runoff from the streets that leak into the manholes and transformer vaults. The salt eats the insulation producing an explosive/flammable gas; the wires short out and spark, which then becomes the source of the ignition. If the manhole covers are older, the blast may put up enough pressure to turn them into cast iron Frisbees (newer manhole covers are made with vents to release pressure from harmful/explosive gases). Lastly, fire and carbon monoxide can make its way into nearby properties, specifically if the building’s electric service enters through an underground conduit.
Yes you read right we are having a DT Call if you fancy working with some crazy friendly chicks and can make a card once a week do some commenting and write the post on a rota dont be put off by the last we will help and if this old hen can do it you can. Well if you fancy it enter this weeks challenge and put DT next to your name how easy is that.
There are a variety of styles and colors.
Must be my first cold of the season.
We visited a battleship, an aquarium, the beach and a fort. I was in charge of four boys. We spent the most time at the battleship’s gunnery set-up, with all four of them crawling over the various killing implements, trying to figure out which one would do the most damage in the least amount of time.
Perry has a boyfriend and grew up singing in church.
“Victor!! Oh my dayss are you okay babe?! Please tell me you are!” She screamed. I’m suprised no one has complained about the noise we’re making, *smh*.
Glad God created you...you make our world fun & you connect with people easy
A) Taxi from center of Cuzco to combi terminal (an eight passenger mini-van) = 3-5 Soles
But think about this for a moment: An ad platform created by a millennial originally for other millennials—the most diverse U.S. generation ever—accounts for nearly one in three online ad impressions and spans all demographics, but it doesn’t ask for your race or ethnicity on your profile. It therefore can’t explicitly target in this key way. Nor can MySpace, or LinkedIn or Twitter.
I stood there for those five or ten seconds or so that it took for the woman to get out the door, mind sifting through a hundred bad ideas and coming up with nothing, knowing that I was failing right then. Knowing that I might be blowing the chance to save this girl's life.
Masters Final (25-34)
Here, to spoil your weekend, is the entire Music for Pleasure (seriously?) album Cannon and Ball Together, featuring the stand out tracks Crying, Bandido and Everybody's Making It Big But Me, which references Paul McCartney, Mick Jagger and includes the statement 'You're a poofter!' Ahh, memories.
Today is the day. I had to do it. No more little chicken
Like Masumura, with whom he shares a certain spiritual affinity, Kim’s career followed a similar trajectory—from the technical mastery, youthful vigor and keen powers of observation of his early years and the experiments with color in the 1970s—to the tawdriness of his maturity that all too often descended into mere camp. Yet it is by these latter that he has come to be known—to the extent that he is known at all—to a handful of festival goers and cult film fans. Park Chan-wook, Kim Ji-woon and Bong Joon-ho are just a few of of the younger generation of filmmakers upon whom Kim’s legacy has left its imprint.
The Sun’s Trevor Kavanagh on the biggest police operation in British criminal history
As Teresa Amina says the origins of this disaster goes right back to the early 1980s with Maggie Thatcher over here and Ronald the Ray-gun over there! Remember the strap line for the film 'Wall-street'? It was "Greed is good" as the mess we're in so well shows - IT ISN'T!!!
VG: Do you think when we use something that we noted because we found it intriguing, it 'puts it to bed' and stops the wondering?
than yesterday reminded me
On the can I used Recollection Adhesive Backed Fabric Paper
Wooden Wand (AKA James Toth) is an extremely prolific singer/songwriter, who has produced over 100 releases, running the gamut from folk to psych-rock. M3 contacted James to talk about record stores, the therapeutic qualities of a good album & future releases…
Happy, happy birthday to my twins - I am so glad that they are not "normal"....I love you, C & Z!
There"s no such thing as too much candy
Tues
But then when you drink it, it’s a little disappointing. It’s all a bit thin and empty, the body isn’t there and the finish is all metal and tannic astringency. That aroma sets you off thinking about big barley wines, roaring fires and cold toes; but the flavour just doesn’t deliver. Booo!
To be sure, he is the Saviour, Christ the Lord (2:11), and yet he takes his place with us in the mundaneness of the everyday world. And the salvation he brings comes in context of real life, and to people just like us.
To sign a deal with Joorabchian
still winter
Just take a look at the website and write below which product you would choose if you win.
P.S. After Beefy came to my defense, Anon posted another comment apologizing for any hard feelings. I believe she had no ill intentions and I welcome constructive feedback.
In short, it sucks.
Something Blue: The sequel to Something Borrowed, I had high hopes for this book. I miust say that I wasn't drawn to this one as much as the first one. I just have problems believing people change that drastically and that people suddenly fall in love, but all in all, an enjoyable book. 2.5-3 stars out of 5.
I like these Romanian postage stamps too! Especially the bear with the flowers! Remember that you can always click on my photos to enlarge them.
“NASA scientists,” The Daily said, “are shrugging their shoulders with little or no idea when – or where – a satellite the size of a bus will fall to Earth. The latest projections last night were that the defunct NASA satellite would tumble to Earth from space sometime this afternoon, but because the satellite is free-falling, the space agency and the U.S. Air Force cannot make a precise prediction about when and where it will hit.”
49 Lord of the Flies – William Golding
The boys have season lockers. Most people choose to use keyed locks as opposed to combination locks. The key is attached to a band that is worn on one’s ankle. The boys are always bothered by the sight of a man missing a leg who wears the band and key on his stump. In the unroofed locker area many older men sit on chairs either naked, or with towels draping themselves, and play pinochle as they get some sun.
Only problem here is that Tejada, while he should have made every effort to attend camp as an early bird, didn’t technically have to. After all, Collins mentioned it after Tejada didn’t show up. He also can’t make him report early.
It is learnt that the 28-year-old engineer, whom the task force had been hunting since 2007, had just returned from Thailand when he was arrested by the officers at a house in Keramat here.
The situation has Democrats in a box. If they fight the Republican effort to cut back payments of the tax credit, they will be favoring the delivery of refunds to people who not only do not owe income taxes but are not supposed to be in the country in the first place.
Avery Brewing Company The Reverend
The overall effect was very odd to me... I figured the bottle that was in the fridge would age more slowly and that the two would come out backwards from what they did... overall I am just perplexed on how or why 2 beers could come out different like this... oh well we shall see how the next one comes out in another 3 months. Only time will tell...
A week or so ago, as noted by the folks at Zillow, Mister Seacrest re-listed the just-over-an-acre estate with a new, improved and much lower asking price of $11,985,000. A few quick flicks of the well-worn beads on Your Mama's bejeweled abacus shows that's just $485,000 more than the $11,500,000 he paid for the place in April 2006 when he bought it from two-time Oscar winner Kevin Costner.
the phone book keeps hundreds of different
Pairing: Gen, Clint Barton/Phil Coulson
Verse 7 is the climax of the song. The Psalmist comes to the conclusion that he is happier with what God has given him than anyone around him who is blessed with the most prosperous life.
Alex: Where is the project at right now?
geometric modulation:
His body in the ground
To every heart that has been broken
Recollections 'Paper Tickets' ("be original")
In a very real sense, a lot of the "creative" side of the computer revolution is descended in one way or another from desktop publishing. That was the moment when computers stopped being an appliance or a computational tool and became a canvas, too.
For those of you who are doing this with me, THANK YOU!! I am giving you an assignment. Please come back next week Wednesday with proof that you are participating, whether you give an excerpt out of your food journal, a picture of your feet as you walk, a great recipe or something fun.
Paul struggled with a thorn in his flesh for the rest of his life.
I'm sure you've all heard about the flood in Nashville. What you may not know is that my sister lives there. Her house flooded within feet of the roof! She lost everything.
I clamour for you in a dream
The card spotted was Mervi's wonderfully flowered card found on her blog - Leikkaan. Bringing together the lovely trio and adding in Dot for good measure, Mervi has used her talents with embellishments to make her creation shine.
GIIP boasts a stellar team consisting of resident faculty, overseas faculty and visiting faculty. Some of the luminaries include:
Good Morning! I hope you all are having or will have a great weekend! Unfortunately I have a TON of housework to do- but hopefully can do some crafting as well!
53. Chocolat - Joanne Harris
Not only do I love the texture of this piece, but I love the colors I used. I love bright and bold colors, and use them often, but I'd never tried this color combination before. But I was trying to break out of using the same old colors I normally used, so this was kind of a risk for me. One I'm glad I took.
If the pattern is fine, you can safely be sent home. If there is any doubt, your obstetrician will be called and further tests may be necessary.
As the weather ever so slowly (but steadily) warms; the rocks along the shore, the tree trunks along the trails, and the park benches in the town, warm along with them. This means more time to sit and enjoy the views, and practice the fine art of doing nothing.
worshipped.
And he reverently consumes the Body of Christ.
I haven’t read a bunch of hacker stories, and really know very little about the hacker lifestyle. As a reader not in the know, I really didn’t buy the finger pushups thing. While it may very well be something they do and believe strengthens their fingers, it just seemed weird to me.
Same dogs bark.
Today, all of us sat down to watch a funny movie on television. We enjoyed ourselves thoroughly munching the snacks that I had taken care to make (much to the surprise of my husband and son). We made plans as to how we would spend our weekend, where we would go, whom we would visit, what games we would play and also ‘can I watch at least an hour of Cartoon television?’ by my son.
The idea of ‘family planning’ was officially introduced into the Chinese political and the legal systems at the start of the post-Maoist era. The introduction of and explanation of this idea were significantly affected by Malthusian demographic theory in China. (Lee and Wang 1999) To justify implementing a strict birth control plan, the first post-Maoist government advocated a Malthusian argument: economic production cannot keep pace with population growth without family planning. Thus, reducing the national birth rate was treated as essential to the development of the state’s economy. Deng, the first president in the post-Maoist era, claimed that the state must fulfil the birth control task, which was of major importance for the national economy. In order to achieve this population goal, the government stated that all married citizens must take up family planning and downsize their families.
Step one: Lean the pallet up against a sturdy support, with the back facing you. Or, if it’s comfortable to you, lay the pallet on the ground. Most pallets have one side with a few supportive base slats and one side with even, multiple slats. You will want to use the side with even slats for planting. Plan to staple your plastic backing to the backside/bottom. Decide which end will face the ground and which end will be the top of your planter when you lean the pallet upright. Have the bottom of the planter accessible and facing you because you will need to staple a plastic or cardboard overlay to hold your dirt in place once the pallet is leaning upright.
1. Sunshine Islands
Funny that this is the only other out of state release on here. You see, I love Minor Threat, Effigies, AOF, Necros, Really Red, Big Boys, Minutemen, Kraut, Bad Brains, Government Issue and many more. It's just that the bands I am listing made a huge impact on me when I was around during those years.
What do you think of the new background? It's rocks. Doesn't really fit does it? Read this to see why I chose rocks Jar of Stones
Daughter was so pleased she could hardly speak!
Thus I deduce that from a marketing standpoint (whatever one thinks of the theoretical standpoint) a character's status as a "superhero" trumps the time-period or trappings of that character."
Dead dad. Check (we think).
in this pic i'm wearing a large petal drop, just fyi for an idea on size.
You are probably wondering why I am saying this, well look at it this way…. if you are still in school or just graduate and heading out sending CVs, to start off your career or simply looking for a student job; you will look for colors that are more neutral. If you are just looking for a “weekend” purse then you might look for one with brighter colors or bigger pattern.
I think the answer to that can only be found out a day at a time. To be sure that the answer is the right one, at least the one I think is right “right now” means that I need to work on getting a post out. Bugger. Dinner and I shall muse while I eat.
The intermodal station will support what’s expected to be an influx of tourists and provide safe, convenient and fast travel options for them.
"It's okay," I comforted her, between bites of her bacon. "The dream is over." Saying the words, however, sent apprehensive tingles down my spine.
Hummus and brown rice cake
I have been getting the shellac manicures for some time at the nail salon (pic on right) and love how long they last, but at $25 (+tip) a pop, every two weeks, this doesn't really fit into my money saving plan. SO, I have been waiting on reviews for this product. It has been out for some times and I picked the girls brains at ULTA about how people have liked it. Nothing but good reviews! PLUS I can use any brand of gel nail poish...doesn't have to be the Red Carpet line. Sally Beauty has a great selection so I am excited to try some different colors. I haven't tried it yet because I just got mine done Tuesday, but I'll let you know.
1. Steppenwolf Theater Company’s 30th Anniversary Season
Link to programme website:
If you are thinking that the story sounds a bit strange, that’s because it is. This is my second Laxness novel and it bears little resemblance to Independent People other than for its beautiful prose. Am I allowed to contribute the quality of the prose to the author or must I credit it to the translator? I’m a little confused on that point.Quite apart from how debased Nature becomes in a picture, nothing seems to me to express so much contempt for Nature as a painting of Nature… Certainly Nature is in front of us, and behind us; Nature is under and over us, yes, and in us; but most particularly it exists in time, always changing and always passing, never the same; and never in a rectangular frame. While the prose in this story was equally as magnificent as it was in Independent People, it wasn't really what captured my attention in this work; what I appreciated the most was the history lesson. Those of you who are regular followers of Pink Sheep Cafe will know that I am a huge fan of Timothy Findley. I love the way he blends historical fact with an often satirical fiction. In this way, I found The Atom Station very reminiscent of Findley… well, Laxness came first, so I suppose it’s the other way around, but, either way, I love trying to pick out the fact and the fiction in these tongue-in-cheek, historical reads.
Clarinda was buried just round the corner from the tearoom in the Graveyard of Canongate Kirk, so we popped in to find her.
Thus, I turned back around and headed back to the entrance. The bitterly cold weather was getting a bit too much. Off to one side was this rather interesting setting. 'Once upon a time...' in a magical, enchanting place, I dreamt that the dreams of a young man, my son, would finally get a job. My son, the victim of a brutal economy where so many of our young find themselves becoming 'a lost generation'.
There's an old saying that is very true. The saying is, "Behind every successful man is a good woman." That saying was never any more true than it was of Oswald Chambers. If you walk into just about any Christian bookstore in the world, you will find something that has Oswald Chambers as its author. His book, "My Utmost for His Highest," has become the best-selling devotional book in the world. And yet, if it had not been for his wife, Gertrude Chambers, very few people would even recognize the name of Oswald Chambers. Her name never appeared on any of the 50 books that bear the name of Oswald Chambers. But she is responsible for compiling all of them. In the foreword to "My Utmost for His Highest," she wrote about how the selections had come from various speaking engagements, yet she only signed with initials "B.C." Who was this remarkable woman who insisted on remaining entirely hidden behind the work of her husband?
Now it’s your turn — RZ – July 15, 2011
My dear readers, you may be expecting a rant or a detailed review of the various wars of mass murder, extermination or resource deprivation that the Anglosphere has been engaging in, along with their French, Italian, Spanish and German lap dogs, but no, I fear I will disappoint you, tis day.
Impressed by this tubers bad-boy reputation, Jo and I wondered if it really stood up to its name, or were these wafting accusations simply a lot of hot air? We decided to take this trumpeting tuber head on in a culinary test, and see if we'd be blown away, or vise versa.... sorry.
1/3 cup chopped green onions
Minecrafters Gathering
I adore Silverbulletday. Even though she’s in the Hall of Fame, it seems to me she still doesn’t garner the level of respect many other horses do. Maybe part of it is due to the fact she came along right at the time that while horse racing had an internet presence, it wasn’t at the level it is now, so she didn’t have a chance to grasp as many people. Or it could be that my opinion of her is so high that it’s hard to comprehend others don’t hold her in the same esteem.
OK, hands up, who hates hiccups? I am lay here on my bed trying to do a post of the day and I have cider hiccups, cider mixed with supermarket own brand dry roasted peanuts kind of hiccups, they aren’t nice, they definitely aren’t funny and I don’t want to be the owner of any hiccups whatever style they come in, which brings me to the other part of my blog… antsy… grieving, lows, highs irritable bomb explosion personality of Jekyll and Hyde, oh yes ok in a supermarket, get into the car and bang change heads and start growling at other half whilst he drives, don’t ask me why I haven’t got a clue, I just do it.
BookTango, which is still in beta, offers DIY ebook conversion via its online ebook editor (your file needs to be formatted to BookTango's specifications), and distribution to a variety of platforms, including Apple, Amazon, Barnes and Noble, BooksOnBoard, Google, and Kobo. There's also a cover design function, ISBN assignment, and of course, payment processing.
Something that is SO fun for me to watch, especially lately, is the interaction between these two adorable little people. Parker has even started to go climb in the crib with Dallin about 30 minutes after I get him to sleep because "I just wanted to play with him." (it all happens when I am taking a shower)
I'll be working the 3-11 PM shift, which I'm happy about. The morning shift is waaay too early for me and they won't let anyone work the 11PM - 7AM shift til they have some experience. I expect I'll do some overtime on graveyard as the summer progresses, picking up some extra bucks and freaky stories. Now that the hiring manager has mentioned it, I can't wait to learn the protocol for when the police bring in a prisoner.
Lightly degas the dough, shape into ball or loaf and transfer into baking pan. Let sit for 45 minutes. Towards the end of rising time, preheat oven @ 180C. Apply top with milk, sprinkle with silvered almond.
1. The difference between confidence and arrogance is your ability to clearly see your own weaknesses and your humility.
After a long hiatus – in which my computer has suffered a virus and the loss of a ridiculously over-priced power cord – it seems that my comeback has been perfectly timed to write about the kind of food I wait all year to enjoy. Who doesn’t love Autumn? In fact, if it doesn’t warm your heart to watch the leaves change colors, wear rain boots, and crave creamy-hot bisque, well, you might be a terrorist…
Line-up / Musicians
April 8 with Shaikh Llwellyn Vaughan Lee and April 20-22 with Pir Zia! April is going to be an amazing month, peeps!
Work out for an hour.
"But..." says Ariel, lower lip hanging "...what about us?"
Yes. From when the full written reasons are provided to each party, they have three days to advise the SFA that they intend to appeal.
Winter Frolic
This is the kind of sour you get from kissing your own sister(I can say this because I don't have one.). Sour because she is beautiful and you are in love and you have yet to learn that she is indeed your sister. A chance encounter kind of sour but with this one you're perpetually suspended in the moment that you are first told so that sour is good and the world is still beautiful and you're in love and your sister is still your girl. You get the point. A renegade wheat beer with a pucker face that doesn't go into a full blown suck. Light, citrusy and tangy as a nine volt battery.
Anne Dollár, Miami University
Available from Dafont.com
The Prize
"Black book" chance of turning all in 1st round: 16.2%
-1 medium onion, diced
2010.08.21 Pakistan Baghlia 6 5 Six members of a peace committee are blow to bits by Mujahid bombers.
3 likely
As a teenage metal dude, Metallica were the beez kneez. They revolutionised mid-eighties heavy metal, but somewhere along the line metamorphosed into Spinal Tap! The turning point was probably the death of bassist Cliff Burton. He was the X-factor. After his death, Metallica became just. another. metal. band.
711510 Independent artists, writers, & performers
After walking down this pill-shaped tunnel for a while it comes to a taller, wider chamber with a side pipe. A quick excursion up this pipe lead to the motherload.
Irreverent greeting card retailer Scribbler has a number of unique and quirky gadgets to see you and you’re friends through the summer.
Buy Gold-n-Soft, 15 oz tubs between 7/11-8/10
Think about this when you set your feet in the dancefloor.
There is another Christmas tradition here (in Catalunya region, not all of Spain) that we are also participating in this year. Unfortunately, it is along the same general Catalan theme that I described to you in an earlier post about the caganer. (I don’t get the preoccupation here with pooping, but “when in Catalunya, do as the Catalans do.”) So here’s the story:
“What’s happening?” asked Emily as she entered the living room of Paul’s house. Arty hated her for inviting herself and also Paul for inviting her for safe measure. He grunted for her to be quiet and absorb the news from the television like everyone else, but Paul whispered to her: “One of the birth directors has been assassinated.”
Ella takes her hand. “Let’s go sit on the couch.”
For some people, living from paycheck to paycheck is a way of life. Many of these people don’t even care; they are just happy to be living in the moment. However some are struggling. Some people go without, simply because they cannot afford something that many people take for granted. Perhaps they go without a meal, or a night out with a loved one. Perhaps they go without a bed for the night, choosing to sleep on the streets, just so that they can have a meal for themselves, or perhaps a child.
I’ve confessed my paper addiction before. It’s not getting any better. I wasn’t even looking for paper when I walked past the paper stack section at Michaels and Recollections “Fashionably Chic” jumped off the shelf at me. Practically attacked me. It did!
“I’m well aware of it.”
Hanson called in … the race card.
I like to call her the best birthday gift I've ever gotten. You see, she was born the day before my own birthday. My 32nd birthday, to be exact. What happens when you share a birthday with one of your children? Your birthday gets celebrated jointly or its completely overshadowed by theirs. And you know what, I don't mind one bit. As I grow older, I realize that celebrating birthdays kind of suck.
Your clothes are all made by Balmain
Mom: Well you will still get to see me all of the time.
At about the age of seven I discovered Matthew Arnold's poem The Forsaken Merman.
New Belgium- Abbey- Abbey is a Belgian dubbel brewed with six different malts and an authentic Belgian yeast strain.At Black Swan Brewpub in Plainfield:
WHAT’S that you said?
Lim said the aim was to transform Penang into an international and intelligent city. Just as Melbourne was the cultural and sporting capital of Australia, Penang was likewise in Malaysia.
So now that you've seen my page, you should check out the work by the other really amazing artists participating in this hop. There's a button on the side of my blog that will take you to the other posts. What are you waiting for?? Go look at some art!
Finally, indexed annuities allow investors to track the performance of a financial index. The annuity will usually track the index in a bull market; however, the issuers of the annuity also guarantee a minimum annual interest rate to avoid losses when the index is in a downturn.
Red flag #1: Another unfortunate opening sentence: "I'm a literary agent who loves this job!" Oh, goody.
I suppose I shall end this here. My niece is getting into cookies and my nephew just woke up. Time to be an aunt and a good babysitter.
Rat Club London 17th December 1977
Intro- Part 1 of coloring Sunny Baby With A Hat by Ashley Scheffler
The General Project Plan, approved in December 2006 by the ESDC, stated (right) that Phase 1 of the project was "anticipated to be completed by 2010" and Phase II was "anticipated to be completed by 2016." However, nine months later, in September 2007, the ESDC signed a funding agreement that gives developer Forest City Ratner much more time and also posits a scenario in which much less housing and open space would be built.
I’d be delighted to add you to the growing list of blog subscribers. To subscribe: just scroll back up, fill in your email address and click on the Sign Me Up button. You’ll get an email asking you to confirm your subscription … confirm and you will automatically receive a new stories and recipes.
I got to spend some quiet time with the family.
On Tuesday and Wednesday (the day of the show) Mr. Burien was the only scheduled guest for the show, and Walter was prepared for a three-hour talk. As the interview went on for two solid hours and as the secretive criminal beans were being spilt in a major way, a sudden click happened in the middle of Mr. Noory talking, and Walter’s line went dead. The show suddenly had a new guest to fill the remaining hour. It was then placed onto the Coast-To-Coast website that a second guest was now to appear.
Has anyone ever told you that you remind them of your daughter or son? And have you noticed the quality of this relationship? What if there was a society where everyone reflected on, explored with awareness, this desire and capacity to help others succeed, even for only one day a year? We are presented with a very great and auspicious opportunity through the existence of this holiday. Indeed, Mother’s Day goes deep within.
When medicine rules or obliterates midwifery, it becomes difficult for women to understand the power that midwifery could have if it were once again a profession whose power equaled that of the obstetric profession.
Aristotle’s First Cause was borrowed after narrowing it down to fit the Abrahamic framework by Catholic medieval philosopher St. Thomas Aquinas as an explanation for the Creator god of Christianity. Although this theory was criticised by many Western philosophers, notably Immanuel Kant and David Hume, and is today known in philosophical circles as the Cosmological Argument for the existence of god, what is relevant for us as Hindus is to note that there is a close binding link between the ONE existing god of monotheism and his being THE ONLY TRUE GOD.
Ridgeway Brewing Foreign Export Stout
What I have grown to appreciate about Aamir Khan's films, particularly those of the past decade, is that he seems to go against Bollywood conventions in many ways with his characters. He shows certain flaws or has a certain twist on them that you don't see a lot of the time.
You were originally signed to Moon Records right?
1 cup pitted dates (or date paste)
1. You can make muthiyas from cabbage, sweet gourd (Lauki), spinach (palak), fresh fenugreek leaves (methi), grated mix vegetables, left over dry khichdi (an Indian lentil and rice preparation) or even with left over vegetable pulao (mix vegetable rice).
And finally, a meme-word-game thingy from Val. Pant, whew, puff, gasp. I need a cuppa tea, I don't know about you. Yeah, well, we'll just call this a marathon blog post, shall we - teach me to get all slack. Though frankly, I don't know what any of you did to deserve this monster post...
Really imagine that scene: a bunch of Islamists admiring how astutely the queers--people who in their ideal world would be served with the lash or hanged--had portrayed their critics as mentally disturbed. Brilliant. Let's take a leaf from them and then kill them. The association of anti-Islamism--the noblest form of liberal anti-totalitarianism--with gay-bashing rednecks in the grip of a psychosexual panic was not just one of those linguistic accidents of history, in other words. These guys were sitting there in Virginia and really thinking about the best way to exploit the weaknesses of the Western psyche. They came up with this word--and admit it, it's clever; I challenge you to find a better one if you want to yank the West's chain--and they marketed it with petrodollars, and now it truly does drive public discourse and policy the world over. I was asked when I was recently on a Turkish television news show whether the Tea Party was "Islamophobic." That's what they're hearing here in Turkey, thanks to the IIIT. It's not an indigenous Turkish concept, I assure you....
It is the day,
Targeting: Short range
Essentially I think the process could have been enhanced by replacing the focus on Change with a focus on Assets. I think it might have helped us if we had reflected on all the individual, organisational, community and other assets or resources we can draw on in moving towards our vision. There was some great energy after the visioning and I think that energy could have been harnessed by moving straight into identifying all the assets around us that could help us achieve our vision. By focusing on what needs to change, I feel some of the excitement and enthusiasm was lost.
Welcome to the 12 Days of Christmas Blog Hop Day 3.This hop will take place December 12th through December 23rd and will be full of wonderful ideas and inspiration to get you well on your way of creating all of those beautiful Christmas project. This is an awesome way to get a lot of your Christmas cards, and scrapbook layouts finished, home decorations completed and maybe even be inspired to create something using a new technique that you have never tried. There will be a new project posted each and every day by all the wonderful amazing ladies in this hop. Also each day we will have a guest designer for you to visit. I will be giving away some wonderful blog candy each day of the hop from our amazing sponsors that we have for this hop. I will be posting all the winners from this hop on December 24th. Every one has a chance to win including the ladies participating in the hop and even the guest designers and the sponsors. At the end of each post I will have a list of all the sponsors who are sponsoring this hop all you need to do is click on their name to go to their sites and check out all the wonderful sites. I want to thank each and everyone of the sponsors for their generosity. It has been greatly appreciated.
- $850AUD/ RM2600 (normal rate, from 24rd May 2011)
Hello bloggettes -
Decor Elements piece with applicator
* When you go onto Big Lots site it asks you if you want to join their rewards club. Do it! You get their ads emailed to you two days in advance and then tend to put 20% off coupons in those emails as well.
Oh, and maybe I should warn you about it, because not everyone likes it – there are footnotes. Not in the scale of Jonathan Strange & Mr Norrell, but footnotes nonetheless. And they make me chuckle, too.
from her nursing career - now it's time for her
You can release yourself
The ancient goddess, Eostre, was a Saxon deity who symbolized the passage of time as well as new life and fertility. Eostre was the key symbol of the Vernal Equinox (which was also known as Ostara.) The goddess Eostre was saved by a bird whose wings had become frozen during the winter. The winter cold had turned the bird into a magical hare, who could also lay eggs!
Bake 30 minutes until chicken is cooked through.
Happy New Year everyone! I hope your festive season was filled with happiness and joy for you and all of your family! I've had a lovely self-imposed computer break but I am back and super refreshed!
Pasir Ris Park Town Beach and Pasir Ris Park Beach are connected by a bridge. From here, you can connect to the Bedok Park Connector Network, Tampines Park Connector Network or even go to Changi Beach and East Coast if you have the energy. At the end of this article, there is a brochure, from the National Parks, on the Eastern Coastal Park Connector.
They’re PRACTICE: Sketchnoting hones your skills in observation & listening, distilling and structuring information, creating narratives, and—of course—rapid sketching.
in any event,
And in a week that saw Snow and Stella's "Lily" launch at Selfridges, we also heard from Karl Lagerfeld as he called Adele "Fat" but he covered himself by saying she has a gorgeous face and a divine voice, so I guess he thinks that is OK then and he obviously assumes that we have all forgotten that he was once a fat fag with a fan!
Another great solution is using old dressing-room lockers to stand in as extra capacity for bulky dry goods. These are common finds at antique markets or such sites as eBay and Etsy. With a little sanding and paint, they are fun yet practical closet-space extensions.
i mean, of course, he will understand it sometime. i am not in the least affected by it. but, yes, i am not going to tolerate it.
I call this blood type of blood observation, The Mycotoxic Oxidative Lifestyle and Dietary Blood Screening. It is 100 percent accurate and will withstand any objective scientific investigation, inquiry and/or review.
Well, Maya and the rest of the family have been spending a lot of time in our favorite place - in front of the fire! With our great fireback, the heat just radiates out into the room! Hubby had just gotten home and was relaxing with Maya (you can see his gloves to the right and his leg in the pic). I have to sneak the camera out to take a picture of Maya - she knows what the camera looks like and will run out of the picture if she sees it!
No new recipe yesterday…sorry about that. I got up 3am yesterday to make a 6am flight and didn’t have time to cook for myself ALL DAY!! Eventually I will be making something. Here’s the link I will be trying to make sometime this week!
Of course, they didn't say children were starving, or anything. The article mentions "food insecurity," which I'm highly suspicious of as a concept with any real world relevance. In Canada, "food insecurity" probably means being more than three blocks from a Tim Hortons.
production design and geometry and not purpose built.
Like we used to before,
I have decided to teach preschool at home. As a matter of fact, I have been scouring the library, Amazon and other resources to begin planning her lessons! We are anticipating several fun field trips including a trip to the fire station and pumpkin patch amongst other places! As you can see on one of the photos below, we have already begun our "house rules". "Be kind to others", "Love your family", "Pick up your toys" and "Say Please and Thank You". We have a lot to learn in this school year including beginning phonics, transportation, and more! Abby is quite the lover of books already.
Founded by a melanoma survivor and mother, Cabana Life- Zulily represents a stylish approach to sun safety. All outfits, swimwear, and even hats have sun protection. The swimwear is just adorable, and I just purchased the sailor shirt for my son! I can't wait to see it on him this summer.
Kane: .....
The thing is: she really believes it. And our culture put her there. This utterly memorable, haunting, scathing film will not let you believe those questions about nature vs. nurture, innocence vs. guilt, or good mothers vs. demon mothers are simple ones. You’ll leave this film feeling like you’ve been smacked, too.
The section I'm treating you to is about drinking vessels. And more particularly, why drink from a tankard. There are a couple of surprising answers.
Put cheese on the base, add meat and egg.
In the seventeenth chapter of Saint Luke it is written:
I commit myself to working on my relationship with myself in writing and in my dip assignments and by writing self forgiveness and self correction so that I can bring myself to a point of actually stepping beyond this point that I have been existing at for so long where I am simply unwilling to re-establish myself as self respect.
You stepped out onto the white carpet in quite a stunning way. Even beautiful. Since I have never been a fan of yours, or anything you do I was really impressed. I was taken aback as you glided across the carpet in a gorgeous Alexander McQueen (R.I.P.) creation and escorted by several homosexual service people who were discharged due to the hotly debated Don't Ask Don't Tell policy. Again it was stunning, it was tasteful, and best of all it made a point. You had a valid reason for your grand entrance.
I think this chapter is when Creme starts to act a little nicer, due to her social faux pas.
Our winner is...
1 determined
I learned about the town of Haditha, where 24 Muslims – including a 76-year old man in a wheelchair, women, and even toddlers – were shot up and blown up in their bedclothes as the slept by US Marines. I learned about Abeer al-Janabi, a fourteen-year old Iraqi girl gang-raped by five American soldiers, who then shot her and her family in the head, then set fire to their corpses. I just want to point out, as you can see, Muslim women don’t even show their hair to unrelated men. So try to imagine this young girl from a conservative village with her dress torn off, being sexually assaulted by not one, not two, not three, not four, but five soldiers. Even today, as I sit in my jail cell, I read about the drone strikes which continue to kill Muslims daily in places like Pakistan, Somalia, and Yemen. Just last month, we all heard about the seventeen Afghan Muslims – mostly mothers and their kids – shot to death by an American soldier, who also set fire to their corpses.
Today I'm sharing the card I've made for my Hubby's birthday. It's the Big Day on wednesday and I think we are heading out for a nice steak dinner in the evening.
In the weeks since the revelations there has been a great lamentation and rending of garments about this, a strange form of kabuki dance in which people a shocked, simply shocked, that a writer misrepresented himself. But the story feels more nuanced than at first blush and several of the actors involved are acting out of character.
We’ll be talking about all kinds of nice plants, most of which are easy to grow in your own backyards. Learn a handful of simple remedies for enhancing the health of you and your family. Herbs can be powerful allies in keeping us well as we move into autumn and winter.
Afghan jihad is the greatest incident in the recent history of Muslim Ummah. For the last 300 years, none of the Muslim resistance movements have been successful except Afghan Jihad. From Tipu Sultan to Siraj-ud-Dola, from 1857 ‘s war of independence to Imam Shamil’s resistance and Umar Mukhtar’s struggle, the Muslim nations were captured, enslaved and weakened politically and militarily. For the last 300 years, where ever in the Muslim world there were resistance movements, Muslims were defeated. The need of these resistance movements arose because of the demise of the Ummah as a whole. Only a few valiant, brave men like Tipu Sultan or Siraj-ud-Dola returned those debts which were not even due on them. Because of the collective faults of the Ummah, they had to bear the brunt of the downfall of the Muslims. They had the option to live for 100 years the life of a jackal but these men of Allah preferred the life of a lion even if it was for one day. They lived like lions and due to their valour, succeeded in this world and the next. But their martyrdom was not able to change the fate of Muslim Ummah because it had been destined that the Ummah would suffer for a while. The punishment of the collective faults of the Ummah was great indeed.
SO if you wanted to play along, just click HERE to be directed to the Case File and see what else my fellow DT members from C'est Magnifique and what the other Design Team members and Guest Designers created. You have until next Sunday, May 13th to enter!
I finish work, get on my and race home. They were leaving right then so I had to get ready quickly. I bust through the door, run in, jump in the shower, throw together a few camping clothes. Blake and Pete are already here at my apartment and Pete is trying to convince Blake to blow work off the next day so he can come with us. As I’m getting the last of my things together I also get in on the high energy pep talk. After arms flailing wildly, loud voices and commanding speeches delivered by Pete and I – Blake finally agreed (although reluctantly at first) to come on the adventure!
And as quickly as I was tempted to be in my bubble and ignore people around me, I realised I didn’t want to be like that. I often kept the music on my ears, yet I started to look around me and observe people. And as I started to look at them, I saw how each of them is unique. I saw them smiling and crying, fighting and blessing, waiting and hoping. The more I focused on them, the more my thoughts slowed down, and while judgments initially kept on popping up, gradually I came to merely observe them as they are and found myself full of gratitude and tenderness.
3/4 cups all-purpose flour
So, no, I don’t like “fag hag.”
Items we should be hoarding now:
So what are we to make of Russell’s scathing indictment of Nietzsche? Russell has certainly made a strong and convincing case for his opinions, but one that I feel is only one possible interpretation and in one historical context. This interpretation seems too shallow and dismissive of such a complex well-spring of ideas that was Nietzsche. For example, I understand and sympathize with Russell’s rejection of the concept of the Übermensch and the Will to Power as an ‘aristocratic lust for power’. I am not so sure about the validity of Russell’s conclusion that Nietzsche’s philosophy was the result of universal hatred and fear. My reading of Nietzsche is incomplete, but it is already clear to me that he is more important and useful than Russell gives him credit for. He is one of the most original and captivating Western thinkers of modern times (or probably of any age), and the breadth of his influence already shows that his ideas cannot be pigeon-holed or dismissed so easily.
Why do we have thoughts?
How did the French cuisine draw the winning lottery ticket and entering the world stage as «haute culture». Many of the famous dishes which has been spread beyond France’s borders by restaurant chef’s, have a traditional and simple origin. More often than not, classic French dishes have been transformed from traditional dishes into fine dining, thru the extravagant royal households. Maybe, without the flamboyant king’s of France, the French cuisine would be a footnote in the culinary history books, rather than a locomotive, steamrolling food as one of the most important aspects of culture.
I knew I was going to be busy when I started this venture. However, I also don’t want to become a workaholic. I truly love what I do, but my life is more than that. I have kids, grandkids, my other job, my mother, my boyfriend, and my piano…all the thing I love and am not ready to give up. I think all aspects of my life can co-exist peacefully.
July 1st, today! But life is not always easy to handle, even though I am almost done. The quilt is now tucked under the Janome, and is half way quilted. But to machine quilt a 225 x 225 cm piece is not easy...
“Give your entire attention to what God is doing right now, and don't get worked up about what may or may not happen tomorrow. God will help you deal with whatever hard things come up when the time comes” (Matt. 6:34).
Here's a close-up of the bag. I just love the purple accents and the Ness tag! It's a great size bag with two separate sides with a button closure. It also comes in the lovely burgundy and pink tartan called 'Almandine' (the same tartan used in the Laya bag I reviewed)
10. What do you love most about your work?
I wanted to add molding to the top of the cabinets, but I struggled with that, so instead I did a faux baten board treatment, which makes a nice backdrop for my pottery collection. I had greenish glass knobs from a redo project I did a while back, so the cream cabinets got those and the black cabinets got new chrome knobs.
I sat there trying hard not to laugh.
@Kipper42: Wants to write one last thing on his chalkboard; chalk breaks. Beck breaks down in tears. Fade to black
“It’s time to end the double standards and stop selling weapons to these authoritarian and repressive regimes.”
02) Tomorrow's Girls (Totp's)
In order to defeat Islam so, we must do four things.
In place of the former Spring (old signage still up) , this modern little rotisserie serves up a simple menu composed of good quality products. This evening: roast chicken (the rare coucou de Rennes, no less), complemented by apples and roast potatoes in goose fat, and a mushroom salad with grenadines, followed by pears with honey, pear cake and pear compote with creme fraiche and chocolate. The idea is not to do another Spring, but rather a remote-controlled, Rose consulted menu that will appeal to neighbors (ie take out) as much as clued-up, jetsetting diners, with another chef behind the oven (leaving Rose to continue his other projects). The entire meal tonight was prepared by Daniel, who wasn't actually supposed to be there, and we counted ourselves as the lucky few, as this will not be a likely occurrence in the future. Again, this is not Spring II, but a simple place for a good meal, early or late, without spending a fortune. Menus are 29€ or 34€, whether you order a quarter or a half chicken.
The different plots are entirely based on the current and past relationships of these characters. It’s easily to expect too much from this though; the harsh truth is that those relationships only include ‘love’ and the summer that they spent together. The show gives new meaning to the overly used drama premise ‘love-triangles’ by adding more vertices.
Which is easier said than done.
And where, exactly, is that line between the two?
GARROSH: Um…yes?
-2 blood oranges
One thing I've realized from talking to other knitters at Stix-n-Stitches, my local yarn hangout, is that people really don't want to work complex designs. What they want is simple shit that looks good. So I've been working on a series of designs I call "Stoopid TV Knitting". The sock below, knit with Carol's wonderful Black Bunny Fibers SoftSilk 50% merino/50% silk sock yarn, is a 6-round, 4-stitch repeat.
Subjugating the women into slavery and the men into slavery as well because let’s face it, it’s a lord of the flies situation. And better you than them. In modern society however, there are laws against sharpening rocks and sticks and subjugating people into slavery therefore one needs to be less direct in their tactical assertion of flirtations and their flirting.
Hi Readers — Here’s a post from the Campaign for a Commercial-Free Childhood about School Bus TV. The idea of kids being force-fed even MORE screen time just nauseates me. Fortunately, Josh Golin, associate director of the Campaign, articulates the arguments against bus TV far better than my fake retching sounds. He also references his group’s successful 4-year fight against BusRadio, an equally appalling idea to pipe in radio — and ads — to moppets riding the bus to school. — L.
*Designer Cakes made by students in the Family and Consumer Science Department (the cakes will be Auctioned off in the Silent Auction)
This due diligence period is relatively new inGeorgia. We used to have “inspection periods” instead. In the former version of our purchase and sale agreement (with the inspection period rather than the due diligence period), it was tougher for a buyer to get out of a contract once she or he had entered into one – to terminate the contract, the buyer had to find a defect in the property through the inspection, ask the seller to fix it – AND the seller would have to refuse to fix it for the buyer to get out of the contract. If the seller agreed to fix all defects, the buyer was bound and would be liable for breach of contract if they failed to proceed.
Eric Canete’s art is very interesting. It will be irritating for those that like pencilling to be extremely clean, however I see his work as being highly personalised and loved intensely by those who appreciate its style. His greatest pictures feature a robotic protagonist and are steeped in cinematic drama.
One effect of this bubble is that frequently Pip’s mode of approach to Polly has been parental. At times this has taken on a classic, bossy older sibling form where he watches Polly closely and does his best to regulate her behavior according to the rules as he knows them. He keeps her from walking out into the street without a parent. He gently chastises her for throwing something inside the house. He asks her repeatedly not to splash water out of the bathtub. He does all these things because he has seen Ava and me do them.
4. Children's laughter. Sometimes it seems like I took a wrong turn at Albuquerque. Wasn't it my destiny to be surrounded daily by the laughter of children rather than the hum of computers? Maybe it still is...
Yeah, so I’m moving to Maryland and away from Florida and all, and while thinking about how I’m almost out of 9th grade, I realize that I feel almost NO attachment to the people at school. Really. I mean, is that weird? That I don’t care about leaving the people I know so well? I could count on my two hands how many people at school I’m going to miss. I could not, however, count how many people talk to me about their secrets and problems.
Taylor agreed to go to his home, but immediately his conscience was stricken. He to was living on virtually a starvation diet, but he had money – a half crown – in his pocket. It was all the money he had, and his own food was running out. “If only I had two shillings and a sixpence,” He contemplated, “instead of this half-crown, how gladly would I give these poor people a shilling!” But to give all his money to a stranger – that was unthinkable.
4. 28 Hendrie Drive… Asked $1,495,000. Sold $1,205,000. Started 5/2010
If you would like a copy of Jamie's Great Britain, you are in luck. I have been give two copies to give away.
I hope that helps. And I wish you luck with your screenplay. Let me know when you’ve completed your script. I’d love to read your work!
It is because of Fuzz and his saying that inspire me to create this note. I actually started doing this during my student teaching. It does take me awhile to fill these out for each student. It is also a neat way to reflect on the school year. I love seeing their faces will reading it. Parents have even commented "You really did this for each kid?" and "How sweet" so I know my time and effort is worth it.
LOVE her being there! She is such a tough little girl! She will do whatever- dig in the dirt, move mulch around, and she is NOT afraid of bugs in the least!!
Further, I think either the powers of the Creator are deeply undermined in the movie, or he’s not the real Creator.
My mood drops with the temperature as the cold seasons arrive. I only realize this when the sun comes back and the green shoots start to appear. That's when I can compare my new sunny mood to the gloomy cloud hovering above me during the winter.
And on a whim, despite the list
built of styrofoam and blue rubber gloves.
People often ask me what advice I would give the White House about various things. Today I was mulling over election results from New York and Nevada while thinking about that very question. What should the White House do now? One word came to mind: Panic.
NASA, apparently, is responsible for many, many daily enjoyments. In a footnote, there is a list. It is not a small one. For example: Natick purees. They were one of the options for food in the space. Puree everything and stick it in a pouch with a spouty-thing at the top. It messed with the astronaut's heads, but I know some toddlers who love their puree pouches when they're on the go. Also: freeze dried ice cream is now "yogurt melts" and available at your local baby food store.
I have spent several months now perusing a new body of literature, thinking deep thoughts with my right palm pressed against my sweaty forehead, wondering how I will get started, overcome by obstacles. Entire days have gone by when I haven't been able to identify a single productive element of the day, except maybe learning the definition of 'endogenous'. I have felt useless. I have felt lazy.
Akiyama Yo (born 1953) and Hoshino Satoru (born 1945) are both members of Sodeisha (the “crawling through the mud” group), whose members in the 1950s first created ceramic sculpture in Japan. Both love to grapple with issues of creation and destruction, as well as peering beneath the surface to see what exists within. Akiyama does this by burning and tearing his potted clay, while Hoshino punches and pinches to find the quality of the material beyond the facade.
“I’ve often said that there’s no such thing as writer’s block; the problem is idea block. When I find myself frozen—whether I’m working on a brief passage in a novel or brainstorming about an entire book—it’s usually because I’m trying to shoehorn an idea into the passage or story where it has no place.” ~ Jeffery Deaver
May 02, 2012 03:01 PM EDT
But now it’s up to voters to take matters into their own hands — since New York’s political leadership has proved too cowardly to do so. They can do this by voting for Cuomo or Paladino only on either the Democratic or Republican lines, in hopes that the minor parties all fall short of the 50,000-vote threshold.
Sue’s books are grounded in the landscape of Britain, especially the beautiful county of Somerset where she now lives, which contains the original Isle of Avalon, the mysterious Glastonbury Tor, and the misty marshes where Alfred once hid from the Danes. (Her latest book, ‘Emily’s Surprising Voyage’ is a story of Brunel’s spectacular ship the SS Great Britain, now permanently to be found in Bristol harbour.) I can’t resist quoting this passage from her website, about a visit to Athelney ‘where Alfred made such a botch of baking the cakes’:
Sunday 12:30 -1:30 Ryan Shaw (Young guy from Georgia trying to revive the golden age of soul) Big Stage.
The most significant addition found in many mediaeval Uses is the invoking of assistance for an emended life and for the grace of the Holy Spirit. Thus the Sarum Use has “The almighty and merciful God grant you absolution and remission of your sins, space for true repentance and emendation of life, and the grace and consolation of the Holy Spirit” This was also found in the Mozarabic texts (see previous post).
This element of the job comes as a surprise to many new interior designers, who expect to have less of an administrative and technical role and more of a role in influencing the overall feel and appearance of a space. Those who thrive in the industry say this ability to balance the practical with the aesthetic is crucial to being a successful interior designer. Interior design is hard work, but those who do it well find the work very satisfying.
I can do this for any Hispanic artist and work of art, not just Guernica. Picasso and Guernica are on my mind because I talked about them one day with the students during a presentation I gave in Spanish about art. Frida Kahlo’s paintings usually have a story behind them, documenting a major event in her life. Goya turns from bright paintings to dark images after becoming deaf as a result of illness, and he portrays historical events in paintings during the French occupation of Spain. Velazquez’s “Meninas” is always interesting to talk about. I’m supposed to be doing the preterite tense, but I think asking students to react to the art is very important. I recall a great presentation by Lisa Lilley at a conference where she described turning her classroom into a gallery and having students stand in front of the artworks and comment on them in Spanish. I think it would be a great time to review descriptive adjectives and vocabulary to describe feelings. I also saw where a teacher used art to practice verbs like gustar to tell opinions about the paintings. Here are some more ideas about using art: http://web.cortland.edu/flteach/FAQ/FAQ-Art.html and http://languagelinks2006.wikispaces.com/Art-based+Activities
A, Daddy and I are so proud of the young lady that you are becoming.
This is 43% the average bull ratio and therefore still a very low level of optimism overall. The four week moving average of the bull ratio was basically unchanged and the lowest since late July 2010. For the chart, see last week’s sentiment overview.
And with Conor Lovett's truly extraordinary delivery, and Judy Garland's actual voice, I think the BBC created a moment that was better, more emotionally powerful, than my original. I really did feel the hairs rise on the back of my neck, and along my legs, no kidding.
The next morning, the first thing my parents asked was about the date, to which I told my mom (my dad didn’t bother to listen) that I had fun and he was really nice. And she was happy/excited. Any trace of her worries from the previous night had gone out the window. It was kinda weird, actually.
I'd say this was a disturbing and thought-provoking book - but that seems rather too trite a comment. Pierre Anthon's attitude challenges what most of us would feel. If we start believing that nothing is of value, where will we end up? - this is the abyss that opens in front of his classmates - and the reader. His constant declaration that nothing has meaning reminded me of Renton's opening speech from Trainspotting "Choose life. Choose a job. Choose a career. Choose a family......But why would I want to do a thing like that? I chose not to choose life: I chose something else", but Renton's "something else" stops him asking about the meaning of life: Pierre Anthon is offering no such quick fix. More disturbing are the lengths his friends go to to prove him wrong...
The main colour combination I used for this set is Chocolate Chip, Wild Wasabi and Whisper White - but I used several more colours for colouring the Dinosaurs.
Burke’s resistance to unbridled power and his rejection of political vice are important reminders for contemporary conservatives that reform is wholly compatible with their political philosophy. A Burkean approach expands and improves upon our conception of modern conservatism: it is both a defender and a restorer of liberty
In case you’re now distracted, I was writing to you medicated readers. My deal is a Woodstock-like experience around my Pazuzu Trilogy. Actually, more of a Jack Kerouac in Big Sur kinda deal. I’d love to have a Magic Bus and blast Dubstep through the forest. First, I need you to read my story, talk about it and make me infamous. Spread rumors if you have to.
As I sat there, feeling sorry for myself, frustrated at the lack of control, I summoned all the positive thinking and strength I could muster for the a final assault. Knowing myself as well as I do, I need a plan or plans. I need goals; something to work to, something to look forward to, something to help distract me and not dwell. Most of all, I need to believe.
If you want to know what’s happening around town, there is a quick listing of events on the home page and a full calendar as well. Click on any event within the calendar and all the details for that particular event will pop up. The site will also feature weekly restaurant specials on the home page along with weather updates!
On a side note...this happens not only in India but here in our own backyard. You think it doesn't in your town but it does! Just this week a massage parlor here in Birmingham was invaded by police & found women who had been trafficked in from other countries. It happens here too & it disgust me. All you have to do is google the statistics of sex trafficking in the USA & you will be astonished at the numbers. And not only that but how few laws we have to protect these women. Get educated & get involved!
In December 2010, Lam Tei Red Seasons, one of the Group’s restaurants, was awarded by the Michelin Guide Hong Kong Macau 2011 the Michelin Bib Gourmand, the Michelin Guide distinction awarded to those restaurants which are judged to be “a wonderful restaurant with top-quality cuisine at highly affordable prices”. The Michelin Guide was first published in 1900 and is currently published annually covering 23 countries, which we believe is one of the world’s most well-known and influential restaurant guides to date... more
I have all but forgotten about the activity outside. The doorbell rings. Seeing it is the friend’s father I open the door and exclaim brightly “Burnt the toast again!”
Sarcasm aside, there are a great many activities in the offline world that have a tenuous connection with ROI, including one of the mightiest and most-ingrained metrics in the offline advertising world: Cost Per Thousand Impressions (CPM).
She sits there in the rain
My therapy this weekend was finishing up DS's Dresden plates. I desperately needed some time Sunday afternoon to clear my head. So, I finally set up the featherweight, since that's that I started them on, and started chain stitching. Also set up the laptop tuned to some old British Miss Marple mysteries on Netflix.
Abramovic is famous for pushing the limits of her physical and mental endurance as a way of expanding her inner-most feelings and fears — and sometimes those of her viewers.
She wears flowing gowns, flowers in her hair.
These cookies were made with J in mind. Not too sweet, a close cousin to his favorite, a good morning glory muffin that meets a carrot cake to form a sandwich cookie.
only one thing:
“Again. So gross.”
Scranton ain't got nothing on us yo.
That is the opening line to my first attempt at a short story. The same story that first gave me a taste of what people who care about me can do to make me care about myself. My teacher all those years ago in grade six sent me away during English. Every morning, I was not allowed in class because I could not spell the words on the white board.
The Assistant Director will encourage students to volunteer and become active participants during their law school career. The individual will also have oversight responsibilities for the Public Interest Public Service (PIPS) Scholarship Program and will work with each class of PIPS scholars to focus on various public service commitments while in law school.
There were rolling blackouts several times a day. It didn't matter what city we were in, or what time of day it was. I am not an electrician, but I think the wiring might be part of the problem.
01/20/2011 BUY 0.02 xauusd 1347.040
On February 27th, I hosted The Evil Genius Blogfest.
“Please do!”
Well, any how, here the story stays,
The reason this rifle was on my mind is because of the new scope mounts I recently installed. After purchasing and mounting a Weaver K4 4x scope back in high school, I've tried several sets of mounts on the dove-tail or "tip-off" scope rail - all of which have seemed to slip or move over time no matter how much you tightened them down. I recently ran across some B-Square dove-tail to Weaver-style adapters at MidwayUSA that seemed purpose-built to eliminate my perpetual scope shifting problem. After installing them along with an inexpensive set of Weaver one-inch scope rings, I went out back to the range, sighted in the scope at 50 yards and then proceeded to dispose of 400-500 rounds of Federal .22 bulk-pak ammo. The scope never moved or shifted and held zero the entire time.
I don’t really have much to say about this page, so here are some thoughts on a Jurassic Park video game instead.
Happy Birthday to my firstborn son who is such an example to me of living life to the fullest!
Well shoot, I need to keep them quiet? Now here I was planning on letting them run up and down the aisles of the plane yelling. I was going to let them bring a guitar too so they could bang it on everyone's head as they walked past. Movie anyone?
“I lived during the Old Testament time. I was very beautiful and lived in the king’s palace. I was forbidden to go to the king, but risked my life in order to ask the favor that would save the lives of all my people. Who am I?” (Esther) “Shine On” -144 (Esther's costume is the one above-just a head scarf/band)
Let me concentrate on the first book in the trilogy, The Hunger Games, for this review. I’ll begin by admitting that except for the Harry Potter series I haven’t read any young adult fiction since I was in that age category which was a very long time ago. The movie trailer caught my attention and I knew I wanted to read the book before watching the movie.
How do I feel tell me now
1231. Genji Sushi & Sesame Kale from Whole Foods Market (Devon, PA) @ Home – 1:45 p.m.
In Public, Jia Zhang Ke, China. Documentary, 33 min.
So shall the song of songs be born in Spain.
granted, all friends are subject to moving up and down this scale, but i generally only count the first two as my actual friends. The other three are me being too nice to say I’m not really friends with them, but that’s just me. I mean a lot of my “greatest people on earth” came from the “sure, why not” group.
Then I had a few very frustrating years. I started with the attitude that I would give it my best shot, so that I wouldn’t be able to berate myself later in life for not trying. But of course, it doesn’t work like that, and the books I was writing became my complete obsession.
To boot, the characters are exaggerated. A roundish guy? Dwarf size? Is Haruyuki even a human? The attitude takes up from the cliché picks, but there’s really nothing better than being cliché. As for his seemingly ‘partner,’ an upperclassmen, who treats him in a such seductive manner, really peaks my interests. No ecchi here in this show, perhaps, but at least we should get some serving of boobs. It’s always lovely to see them once in a while, or while they’re fighting a battle. The show may not be like that, but the whole thing is just good.
It only cost me about 5€ and took about 20mins to make.
There runs the peace train
- A possible new (and affordable!) place to stay in September!
Once the layers are all rolled up, not too tightly, it looks like this. This is the time to do any adjusting, to get it looking how you want. I gave it a slight backwards twist just to loosen the center a bit, but don't over think it. They are all going to look differently, and that's ok.
‘Optus is not merely making available its system to another who uses it to copy a broadcast’ … Rather it captures, copies, stores and makes available for reward, a programme for later viewing by another.’
Pin the seam sown the back.
How does something like that happen?
In 2006 -7 several radical groups including D.S.A., C.O.C., Communist party USA and several former leaders of the terrorist Weather Underground including Jeff Jones, Mark Rudd, and Obama allies Bill Ayers and Bernardine Dohrn to form a new radical umbrella organization Movement for a Democratic Society.
Finally, I realize that Academic Earth isn't television. "Video Content in 2012" doesn't sound quite convey the subject matter of this post since the rest of these are TV show.
Who said you have a right to cash money from writing? I gave hundreds of speeches before I got paid to write one. I’ve written more than 4000 blog posts for free.
At the supper of unleavened bread, do you think the Lord would offer a drink made with yeast?
1. This wrath relates to being thin – skinned
Synchronized swimming not splashy enough? Rhythmic gymnastics not the best beat? High jump not a big enough high?
I'll make sure to take pictures, I'll try and remember to take LOTS of pictures, and I will have a long post on the trip once I get back and settled in.
Our leaders want American citizens to be unaware of the “Civilization Jihad”. They would prefer that we regard Islam as just another religion, like Presbyterianism or Buddhism. They don’t want us to know that Islam is a totalitarian political ideology with a primitive religious component. Our awareness would upset their petrodollar-funded applecart.
As we get ready to bring 2011 to a close, I'm happy to report that it looks like 2012 will be another exciting year for fans of 2-Tone ska and its many musical purveyors who are still keeping the flame of the sound alive.
Deliverance, whose theme is stated by the rhythm as well as the melody instruments, is the longest and freest piece on the album. Bartz gets off some beautiful statements on the soprano, followed by Gerry's first drum solo, which is an exercise in descending dynamics. Bartz steps out again as the band gradually builds in intensity. John Lee's electric bass solo grows not only in power but in the intensity of his statements, with free and complimentary support from the piano and drums. Jasper van 't Hot turns in a great electric piano solo, check the way John's bass glisses and Gerry's drum figures lock in together under him, some raspy thrills from Bartz make the transition into Gerry's next drum solo an impressive, if not brief tour de force, after which the band rejoins for a brief statement of the theme.
These authors have written about the Civil War from the viewpoint of educated citizens and military and political leaders, instead of from ordinary people’s experiences like E.L. Doctorow’s portrayed in his novel “The March”.
Prostate cancer, next to melanoma, is the second most common cancer that affects men.
Nic loved it though and was SO glad we went.
committed to presenting artists’ work created
they got swapped for the muffin-top in that free Prize-Draw you automatically enter at 50
PS: Tomorrow I am posting a Holy Week(end) Playlist. So stay tuned!
5. Fecal Forgery
“You care to justify this action?” He glowers at me, “I can’t say I am eager to leave my daughter in the middle of nowhere because of some fit of insanity.”
I know I promised that this would be a short post. Please bear with me, I’m almost done.
I hope you all have had a wonderful and relaxing weekend.
Many Communist and radical publications and entities throughout the 19th and 20th centuries had the name “Forward!” or its foreign cognates. Wikipedia has an entire section called “Forward (generic name of socialist publications).”
Enjoy your Saturday! I sincerely appreciate your visit and hope you'll come again soon.
Throughout the semester my love for TV increased. I started watching: The New Girl (not as funny as I had hoped for last week), American Horror Story (I was down for everything and anything scary), The Voice (gotta get my singing show in), Dance Moms (drama, drama, drama), Intervention (what’s not to love?) and various other shows that I had never heard of before. I also managed to somehow subscribe to Netflix and get through all eight, yes all eight seasons of Grey’s Anatomy between February and May 1st. I found that as the list of shows I watched expanded, so did the topics I chose to blog on. It was right around the time when I subscribed to Netflix when I stopped blogging about Entourage and tried something new.
Thanks for the suggestion, Hermione, as I do think Season and I will be naming some implements.
Finally, he's so modest that I had to figure it out for myself, but very very long-time EdAss reader and commenter Charles Gramlich just had a book come out! Bitter Steel, a collection of epic fantasy stories, is available from Borgo Press.
fading from view
There are three of us at work doing the Survivor Mud Run and we all decided to start training last Monday, all with very different approaches.
This is what occupied my mind mostly for the last 2 months, and it's where all my energy and time went to for the last 2-3 weeks, it's this baby shower.
We can get away from this town
Here's almost 80 minutes of "Random Songs Of Horror". These tracks come from many different sources. Some were in my collection, some from the library or I downloaded them from someones blog. Please visit the "Nifty Links" section to the right, these are blogs or websites that I visit frequently. Some of these songs may have originally came from one of them.
*From Jim Mair: Kansas City Kansas Community College rolled out its best in vocal jazz at the annual Jazz Cabaret Thursday night. A crowd estimated at nearly 200 filled the Jewell Center for the annual showcase of KCKCC’s talented array of soloists and ensembles.
They look at our labour and laughter as a tired man looks at flies.
Joel, Bjorn Inge, and the rest of the organizing crew made sure that we had PLENTY of beer and other drinks to last for the evening. We did our best to consume all the beer but I think there might have been a few left at the end. Most of us switched from beer to something else after the band stopped. Irene made a couple of nice Irish coffees for me, which probably would explain why I was still standing at 3:30 when the stragglers finally decided to call it a night. I had to walk home in the rain, but since it was already light outside and I was fully intoxicated it didn't seem to matter that much. I got into a large tussle with the zipper on my jacket after I got home. I had it zipped up to the collar and the zipper would not come down when I got in the door, I briefly considered going to bed with a wet jacket on, but after one final heroic effort I got the damn zipper down far enough to yank the jacket over my head. Victory was mine!
I mean, we waste so much energy worrying about it even before it happens. A 27 year old woman catching up with her friend of the same age should be talking fun and happy stuff you’d think. Or exciting stuff which lets your knowledge grow. But all she wanted to speak was about my marriage. How come our parents have not tried doing a drastic drama to control us, how can I trust a man like that, and so on.
Shelly at Prairie Moon Quilts has issued her annual challenge to those that follow her blog. She sets out end of the year tasks and we "try" to follow them.
The third team for the drop? Well you can take your pick from Wigan, Bolton or Blackburn. All of these teams have started to play decent football, but good football doesn’t always get you the results you need.
